Texas statutes.
INSURANCE CODE

TITLE 4. REGULATION OF SOLVENCY

SUBTITLE C. DELINQUENT INSURERS

CHAPTER 443. INSURER RECEIVERSHIP ACT

SUBCHAPTER A. GENERAL PROVISIONS

Sec. 443.001. CONSTRUCTION AND PURPOSE. (a) This chapter may be cited as the Insurer Receivership Act.

(b) This chapter may not be interpreted to limit the powers granted the commissioner under other provisions of law.

(c) This chapter shall be liberally construed to support the purpose stated in Subsection (e).

(d) All powers and authority of a receiver under this chapter are cumulative and are in addition to all powers and authority that are available to a receiver under law other than this chapter.

(e) The purpose of this chapter is to protect the interests of insureds, claimants, creditors, and the public generally, through:

(1) early detection of any potentially hazardous condition in an insurer and prompt application of appropriate corrective measures;

(2) improved methods for conserving and rehabilitating insurers;

(3) enhanced efficiency and economy of liquidation, through clarification of the law, to minimize legal uncertainty and litigation;

(4) apportionment of any unavoidable loss in accordance with the statutory priorities set out in this chapter;

(5) lessening the problems of interstate receivership by:

(A) facilitating cooperation between states in delinquency proceedings; and

(B) extending the scope of personal jurisdiction over debtors of the insurer located outside this state;

(6) regulation of the business of insurance by the impact of the law relating to delinquency procedures and related substantive rules; and

(7) providing for a comprehensive scheme for the receivership of insurers and those subject to this chapter as part of the regulation of the business of insurance in this state because proceedings in cases of insurer insolvency and delinquency are deemed an integral aspect of the business of insurance and are of vital public interest and concern.

Added by Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 995 (H.B. 2157), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2005.

Redesignated from Insurance Code - Not Codified, Art/Sec 21A.001 by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 730 (H.B. 2636), Sec. 3B.004(a)(1), eff. September 1, 2007.

Redesignated from Insurance Code - Not Codified, Art/Sec 21A.001 by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 921 (H.B. 3167), Sec. 9.004(a)(1), eff. September 1, 2007.

Sec. 443.002. CONFLICTS OF LAW. This chapter and the state law governing insurance guaranty associations constitute this state's insurer receivership laws and shall be construed together in a manner that is consistent. In the event of a conflict between the insurer receivership laws and the provisions of any other law, the insurer receivership laws prevail.

Added by Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 995 (H.B. 2157), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2005.

Redesignated from Insurance Code - Not Codified, Art/Sec 21A.002 by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 730 (H.B. 2636), Sec. 3B.004(a)(1), eff. September 1, 2007.

Redesignated from Insurance Code - Not Codified, Art/Sec 21A.002 by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 921 (H.B. 3167), Sec. 9.004(a)(1), eff. September 1, 2007.

Sec. 443.003. COVERED PERSONS. The provisions of this chapter apply to all:

(1) insurers who are doing or have done an insurance business in this state and against whom claims arising from that business may exist now or in the future and to all persons subject to examination by the commissioner;

(2) insurers who purport to do an insurance business in this state;

(3) insurers who have insureds resident in this state;

(4) other persons organized or doing insurance business, or in the process of organizing with the intent to do insurance business in this state;

(5) nonprofit health corporations and all fraternal benefit societies subject to Chapters 844 and 885, respectively;

(6) title insurance companies subject to Title 11;

(7) health maintenance organizations subject to Chapter 843; and

(8) surety and trust companies subject to Chapter 7, general casualty companies subject to Chapter 861, statewide mutual assessment companies subject to Chapter 881, mutual insurance companies subject to Chapter 882 or 883, local mutual aid associations subject to Chapter 886, burial associations subject to Chapter 888, farm mutual insurance companies subject to Chapter 911, county mutual insurance companies subject to Chapter 912, Lloyd's plans subject to Chapter 941, reciprocal or interinsurance exchanges subject to Chapter 942, and fidelity, guaranty, and surety companies.

Added by Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 995 (H.B. 2157), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2005.

Redesignated from Insurance Code - Not Codified, Art/Sec 21A.003 by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 730 (H.B. 2636), Sec. 3B.004(a)(1), eff. September 1, 2007.

Redesignated from Insurance Code - Not Codified, Art/Sec 21A.003 by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 921 (H.B. 3167), Sec. 9.004(a)(1), eff. September 1, 2007.

Sec. 443.004. DEFINITIONS. (a) For the purposes of this chapter:

(1) "Affiliate," "control," and "subsidiary" have the meanings assigned by Chapter 823.

(2) "Alien insurer" means an insurer incorporated or organized under the laws of a jurisdiction that is not a state.

(3) "Creditor" or "claimant" means a person having any claim against an insurer, whether the claim is matured or not, liquidated or unliquidated, secured or unsecured, absolute, fixed, or contingent.

(4) "Delinquency proceeding" means any proceeding instituted against an insurer for the purpose of liquidating, rehabilitating, or conserving the insurer, and any proceeding under Section 443.051.

(5) "Doing business," including "doing insurance business" and the "business of insurance," includes any of the following acts, whether effected by mail, electronic means, or otherwise:

(A) the issuance or delivery of contracts of insurance, either to persons resident or covering a risk located in this state;

(B) the solicitation of applications for contracts described by Paragraph (A) or other negotiations preliminary to the execution of the contracts;

(C) the collection of premiums, membership fees, assessments, or other consideration for contracts described by Paragraph (A);

(D) the transaction of matters subsequent to the execution of contracts described by Paragraph (A) and arising out of those contracts; or

(E) operating as an insurer under a certificate of authority issued by the department.

(6) "Domiciliary state" means the state in which an insurer is incorporated or organized or, in the case of an alien insurer, its state of entry.

(7) "Foreign insurer" means an insurer domiciled in another state.

(8) "Formal delinquency proceeding" means any rehabilitation or liquidation proceeding.

(9) "General assets" includes:

(A) all property of the estate that is not:

(i) subject to a secured claim or a valid and existing express trust for the security or benefit of specified persons or classes of persons; or

(ii) required by the insurance laws of this state or any other state to be held for the benefit of specified persons or classes of persons; and

(B) all property of the estate and the proceeds of that property in excess of the amount necessary to discharge any secured claims described by Paragraph (A).

(10) "Good faith" means honesty in fact and intention, and for the purposes of Subchapter F also requires the absence of:

(A) information that would lead a reasonable person in the same position to know that the insurer is financially impaired or insolvent; and

(B) knowledge regarding the imminence or pendency of any delinquency proceeding against the insurer.

(11) "Guaranty association" means any mechanism mandated by Chapter 462, 463, or 2602 or other laws of this state or a similar mechanism in another state that is created for the payment of claims or continuation of policy obligations of financially impaired or insolvent insurers.

(12) "Impaired" means that an insurer does not have admitted assets at least equal to all its liabilities together with the minimum surplus required to be maintained under this code.

(13) "Insolvency" or "insolvent" means an insurer:

(A) is unable to pay its obligations when they are due;

(B) does not have admitted assets at least equal to all its liabilities; or

(C) has a total adjusted capital that is less than that required under:

(i) Chapter 822, 841, or 843, as applicable; or

(ii) applicable rules or guidelines adopted by the commissioner under Section 822.210, 841.205, or 843.404.

(14) "Insurer" means any person that has done, purports to do, is doing, or is authorized to do the business of insurance in this state, and is or has been subject to the authority of or to liquidation, rehabilitation, reorganization, supervision, or conservation by any insurance commissioner. For purposes of this chapter, any other persons included under Section 443.003 are insurers.

(15) "Netting agreement" means a contract or agreement, including terms and conditions incorporated by reference in a contract or agreement, and a master agreement (which master agreement, together with all schedules, confirmations, definitions, and addenda to the agreement and transactions under the agreement, schedules, confirmations, definitions, or addenda, are to be treated as one netting agreement) that documents one or more transactions between the parties to the contract or agreement for or involving one or more qualified financial contracts and that, among the parties to the netting agreement, provides for the netting or liquidation of qualified financial contracts, present or future payment obligations, or payment entitlements under the contract or agreement, including liquidation or close-out values relating to the obligations or entitlements.

(16) "New value" means money, money's worth in goods, services, or new credit, or release by a transferee of property previously transferred to the transferee in a transaction that is neither void nor voidable by the insurer or the receiver under any applicable law, including proceeds of the property. The term does not include an obligation substituted for an existing obligation.

(17) "Party in interest" means the commissioner, a 10 percent or greater equity security holder in the insolvent insurer, any affected guaranty association, any nondomiciliary commissioner for a jurisdiction in which the insurer has outstanding claims liabilities, and any of the following parties that have filed a request for inclusion on the service list under Section 443.007:

(A) an insurer that ceded to or assumed business from the insolvent insurer; and

(B) an equity shareholder, policyholder, third-party claimant, creditor, and any other person, including any indenture trustee, with a financial or regulatory interest in the receivership proceeding.

(18) "Person" means individual, aggregation of individuals, partnership, corporation, or other entity.

(19) "Policy" means a written contract of insurance, written agreement for or effecting insurance, or the certificate for or effecting insurance, by whatever name. The term includes all clauses, riders, endorsements, and papers that are a part of the contract, agreement, or certificate. The term does not include a contract of reinsurance.

(20) "Property of the insurer" or "property of the estate" includes:

(A) all right, title, and interest of the insurer in property, whether legal or equitable, tangible or intangible, choate or inchoate, and includes choses in action, contract rights, and any other interest recognized under the laws of this state;

(B) entitlements that:

(i) existed prior to the entry of an order of rehabilitation or liquidation; and

(ii) may arise by operation of the provisions of this chapter or other provisions of law allowing the receiver to avoid prior transfers or assert other rights; and

(C) all records and data that are otherwise the property of the insurer, in whatever form maintained, within the possession, custody, or control of a managing general agent, third-party administrator, management company, data processing company, accountant, attorney, affiliate, or other person, including:

(i) claims and claim files;

(ii) policyholder lists;

(iii) application files;

(iv) litigation files;

(v) premium records;

(vi) rate books and underwriting manuals;

(vii) personnel records; and

(viii) financial records or similar records.

(21) "Qualified financial contract" means a commodity contract, forward contract, repurchase agreement, securities contract, swap agreement, and any similar agreement that the commissioner determines by rule to be a qualified financial contract for the purposes of this chapter.

(22) "Receiver" means liquidator, rehabilitator, or ancillary conservator, as the context requires.

(23) "Receivership" means any liquidation, rehabilitation, or ancillary conservation, as the context requires.

(24) "Receivership court" refers to the court in which a delinquency proceeding is pending, unless the context requires otherwise.

(25) "Reinsurance" means transactions or contracts by which an assuming insurer agrees to indemnify a ceding insurer against all, or a part, of any loss that the ceding insurer might sustain under the policy or policies that it has issued or will issue.

(26) "Secured claim" means any claim secured by an asset that is not a general asset. The term includes the right to set off as provided in Section 443.209. The term does not include a claim arising from a constructive or resulting trust, a special deposit claim, or a claim based on mere possession.

(27) "Special deposit" means a deposit established pursuant to statute for the security or benefit of a limited class or limited classes of persons.

(28) "Special deposit claim" means any claim secured by a special deposit. The term does not include any claim secured by the general assets of the insurer.

(29) "State" means any state, district, or territory of the United States.

(30) "Transfer" includes the sale and every other and different mode, direct or indirect, of disposing of or of parting with property or with an interest in property, including a setoff, or with the possession of property or of fixing a lien upon property or upon an interest in property, absolutely or conditionally, voluntarily or involuntarily, by or without judicial proceedings. The retention of a security title in property delivered to an insurer is deemed a transfer suffered by the insurer.

(31) "Unauthorized insurer" means an insurer doing the business of insurance in this state that has not received from this state a certificate of authority or some other type of authority that allows for doing the business of insurance in this state.

(b) For purposes of this chapter, "admitted assets" and "liabilities" have the meanings assigned by the department in rules relating to risk-based capital.

(c) For purposes of Subsection (a)(21):

(1) "Commodity contract" means:

(A) a contract for the purchase or sale of a commodity for future delivery on or subject to the rules of a board of trade designated as a contract market by the Commodity Futures Trading Commission under the Commodity Exchange Act (7 U.S.C. Section 1 et seq.) or a board of trade outside the United States;

(B) an agreement that is subject to regulation under Section 19, Commodity Exchange Act (7 U.S.C. Section 23), and that is commonly known to the commodities trade as a margin account, margin contract, leverage account, or leverage contract; or

(C) an agreement or transaction that is subject to regulation under Section 4c(b), Commodity Exchange Act (7 U.S.C. Section 6c(b)), and that is commonly known to the commodities trade as a commodity option.

(2) "Forward contract" means a contract, other than a commodity contract, with a maturity date more than two days after the date the contract is entered into, that is for the purchase, sale, or transfer of a commodity, as defined by Section 1a, Commodity Exchange Act (7 U.S.C. Section 1a), or any similar good, article, service, right, or interest that is presently or in the future becomes the subject of dealing in the forward contract trade or product or byproduct of the contract. The term includes a repurchase transaction, reverse repurchase transaction, consignment, lease, swap, hedge transaction, deposit, loan, option, allocated transaction, unallocated transaction, or a combination of these or option on any of them.

(3) "Repurchase agreement" includes a reverse repurchase agreement and means an agreement, including related terms, that provides for the transfer of certificates of deposit, eligible bankers' acceptances, or securities that are direct obligations of or that are fully guaranteed as to principal and interest by the United States against the transfer of funds by the transferee of the certificates of deposit, eligible bankers' acceptances, or securities with a simultaneous agreement by the transferee to transfer to the transferor certificates of deposit, eligible bankers' acceptances, or securities as described in this subdivision, on demand or at a date certain not later than one year after the transfers, against the transfer of funds. For the purposes of this subdivision, the items that may be subject to a repurchase agreement:

(A) include mortgage-related securities and a mortgage loan and an interest in a mortgage loan; and

(B) do not include any participation in a commercial mortgage loan unless the commissioner determines by rule to include the participation within the meaning of the term.

(4) "Securities contract" means a contract for the purchase, sale, or loan of a security, including an option for the repurchase or sale of a security, certificate of deposit, or group or index of securities or an interest in the group or index or based on the value of the group or index, an option entered into on a national securities exchange relating to foreign currencies, or the guarantee of a settlement of cash or securities by or to a securities clearing agency. For the purposes of this subdivision, the term "security" includes a mortgage loan, a mortgage-related security, and an interest in any mortgage loan or mortgage-related security.

(5) "Swap agreement" means an agreement, including the terms and conditions incorporated by reference in an agreement, that is a rate swap agreement, basis swap, commodity swap, forward rate agreement, interest rate future, interest rate option, forward foreign exchange agreement, spot foreign exchange agreement, rate cap agreement, rate floor agreement, rate collar agreement, currency swap agreement, cross-currency rate swap agreement, currency future, or currency option or any other similar agreement. The term includes any combination agreements described by this subdivision and an option to enter into any agreement described by this subdivision.

(d) The definitions under this section apply only to this chapter unless the context of another law requires otherwise.

Added by Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 995 (H.B. 2157), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2005.

Redesignated from Insurance Code - Not Codified, Art/Sec 21A.004 by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 730 (H.B. 2636), Sec. 3B.004(a)(1), eff. September 1, 2007.

Amended by:

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 730 (H.B. 2636), Sec. 3B.004(b), eff. September 1, 2007.

Redesignated from Insurance Code - Not Codified, Art/Sec 21A.004 by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 921 (H.B. 3167), Sec. 9.004(a)(1), eff. September 1, 2007.

Amended by:

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 921 (H.B. 3167), Sec. 9.004(b), eff. September 1, 2007.

Sec. 443.005. JURISDICTION AND VENUE. (a) Except as authorized by Section 203(e)(3), Pub. L. No. 111-203, a delinquency proceeding may not be commenced under this chapter by a person other than the commissioner, and a court does not have jurisdiction to entertain, hear, or determine any delinquency proceeding commenced by any other person.

(b) A court of this state does not have jurisdiction, other than in accordance with this chapter, to entertain, hear, or determine any complaint praying for:

(1) the liquidation, rehabilitation, seizure, sequestration, conservation, or receivership of any insurer; or

(2) a stay, injunction, restraining order, or other relief preliminary, incidental, or relating to proceedings described by Subdivision (1).

(c) The receivership court, as of the commencement of a delinquency proceeding under this chapter, has exclusive jurisdiction of all property of the insurer, wherever located, including property located outside the territorial limits of the state. The receivership court has original but not exclusive jurisdiction of all civil proceedings arising:

(1) under this chapter; or

(2) in or related to delinquency proceedings under this chapter.

(d) In addition to other grounds for jurisdiction provided by the law of this state, a court having jurisdiction of the subject matter has jurisdiction over a person served pursuant to Rules 21 and 21a, Texas Rules of Civil Procedure, or other applicable provisions of law in an action brought by the receiver if the person served:

(1) is or has been an agent, or other person who, at any time, has written policies of insurance for or has acted in any manner on behalf of an insurer against which a delinquency proceeding has been instituted, in any action resulting from or incident to such a relationship with the insurer;

(2) is or has been an insurer or reinsurer who, at any time, has entered into a contract of reinsurance with an insurer against which a delinquency proceeding has been instituted, or who is an agent of or for the reinsurer, in any action on or incident to the reinsurance contract;

(3) is or has been an officer, director, manager, trustee, organizer, promoter, or other person in a position of comparable authority or influence over an insurer against which a delinquency proceeding has been instituted, in any action resulting from or incident to such a relationship with the insurer;

(4) at the time of the institution of the delinquency proceeding against the insurer, is or was holding assets in which the receiver claims an interest on behalf of the insurer in any action concerning the assets; or

(5) is obligated to the insurer in any way, in any action on or incident to the obligation.

(e) If, on motion of any party, the receivership court finds that any action, as a matter of substantial justice, should be tried in a forum outside this state, the receivership court may enter an appropriate order to stay further proceedings on the action in this state. Except as to claims against the estate, nothing in this chapter deprives a party of any contractual right to pursue arbitration. A party in arbitration may bring a claim or counterclaim against the estate, but the claim or counterclaim is subject to this chapter.

(f) Service must be made upon the person named in the petition in accordance with Rules 21 and 21a, Texas Rules of Civil Procedure. In lieu of such service, upon application to the receivership court, service may be made in any manner the receivership court directs if it is satisfactorily shown by affidavit:

(1) in the case of a corporation, that the officers of the corporation cannot be served because they have departed from the state or otherwise concealed themselves with intent to avoid service;

(2) in the case of a Lloyd's plan or reciprocal or interinsurance exchange, that the individual attorney in fact or the officers of the corporate attorney in fact cannot be served because of departure or concealment; or

(3) in the case of an individual, that the person cannot be served because of the individual's departure or concealment.

(g) An action authorized by this section must be brought in a district court in Travis County.

(h) At any time after an order is entered pursuant to Section 443.051, 443.101, or 443.151, the commissioner or receiver may transfer the case to the county of the principal office of the person proceeded against. In the event of transfer, the court in which the proceeding was commenced, upon application of the commissioner or receiver, shall direct its clerk to transmit the court's file to the clerk of the court to which the case is to be transferred. The proceeding, after transfer, shall be conducted in the same manner as if it had been commenced in the court to which the matter is transferred.

(i) A person may not intervene in any delinquency proceeding in this state for the purpose of seeking or obtaining payment of any judgment, lien, or other claim of any kind. The claims procedure set forth in this chapter constitutes the exclusive means for obtaining payment of claims from the receivership estate. This provision is not intended to affect the rights conferred on the guaranty associations by Section 443.008(l).

(j) The foregoing provisions of this section notwithstanding, the provisions of this chapter do not confer jurisdiction on the receivership court to resolve coverage disputes between guaranty associations and those asserting claims against them resulting from the initiation of a delinquency proceeding under this chapter. The determination of any dispute with respect to the statutory coverage obligations of any guaranty association by a court or administrative agency or body with jurisdiction in the guaranty association's state of domicile is binding and conclusive as to the parties in a delinquency proceeding initiated in the receivership court, including the policyholders of the insurer. With respect to a guaranty association's obligations under a rehabilitation plan, the receivership court has jurisdiction only if the guaranty association expressly consents to the jurisdiction of the court.

Added by Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 995 (H.B. 2157), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2005.

Redesignated from Insurance Code - Not Codified, Art/Sec 21A.005 by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 730 (H.B. 2636), Sec. 3B.004(a)(1), eff. September 1, 2007.

Amended by:

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 730 (H.B. 2636), Sec. 3B.004(c), eff. September 1, 2007.

Redesignated from Insurance Code - Not Codified, Art/Sec 21A.005 by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 921 (H.B. 3167), Sec. 9.004(a)(1), eff. September 1, 2007.

Amended by:

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 921 (H.B. 3167), Sec. 9.004(c), eff. September 1, 2007.

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 193 (S.B. 1433), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2011.

Sec. 443.006. EXEMPTION FROM FEES. The receiver may not be required to pay any filing, recording, transcript, or authenticating fee to any public officer in this state.

Added by Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 995 (H.B. 2157), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2005.

Redesignated from Insurance Code - Not Codified, Art/Sec 21A.006 by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 730 (H.B. 2636), Sec. 3B.004(a)(1), eff. September 1, 2007.

Redesignated from Insurance Code - Not Codified, Art/Sec 21A.006 by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 921 (H.B. 3167), Sec. 9.004(a)(1), eff. September 1, 2007.

Sec. 443.007. NOTICE, HEARING, AND APPEAL ON MATTERS SUBMITTED BY RECEIVER FOR RECEIVERSHIP COURT APPROVAL. (a) Upon written request to the receiver, a person must be placed on the service list to receive notice of matters filed by the receiver. It is the responsibility of the person requesting notice to inform the receiver in writing of any changes in the person's address or to request that the person's name be deleted from the service list. The receiver may require that the persons on the service list provide confirmation that they wish to remain on the service list. Any person who fails to confirm the person's intent to remain on the service list may be purged from the service list. Inclusion on the service list does not confer standing in the delinquency proceeding to raise, appear, or be heard on any issue.

(b) Except as otherwise provided by this chapter, notice and hearing of any matter submitted by the receiver to the receivership court for approval under this chapter must be conducted in accordance with Subsections (c)-(g).

(c) The receiver shall file an application explaining the proposed action and the basis of the proposed action. The receiver may include any evidence in support of the application. If the receiver determines that any documents supporting the application are confidential, the receiver may submit them to the receivership court under seal for in camera inspection.

(d) The receiver shall provide notice of the application to all persons on the service list and any other parties as determined by the receiver. Notice may be provided by first class mail postage paid, electronic mail, or facsimile transmission, at the receiver's discretion. For purposes of this section, notice is deemed to be given on the date that it is deposited with the U.S. Postmaster or transmitted, as applicable, to the last known address as shown on the service list.

(e) Any party in interest objecting to the application must file an objection specifying the grounds for the objection not later than the 20th day after the date of the notice of the filing of the application or within another period as the receivership court may set, and must serve copies on the receiver and any other persons served with the application within the same period. An objecting party has the burden of showing why the receivership court should not authorize the proposed action.

(f) If no objection to the application is timely filed, the receivership court may enter an order approving the application without a hearing, or hold a hearing to determine if the receiver's application should be approved. The receiver may request that the receivership court enter an order or hold a hearing on an expedited basis.

(g) If an objection is timely filed, the receivership court may hold a hearing. If the receivership court approves the application and, upon a motion by the receiver, determines that the objection was frivolous or filed merely for delay or for another improper purpose, the receivership court shall order the objecting party to pay the receiver's reasonable costs and fees of defending the action.

Added by Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 995 (H.B. 2157), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2005.

Redesignated from Insurance Code - Not Codified, Art/Sec 21A.007 by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 730 (H.B. 2636), Sec. 3B.004(a)(1), eff. September 1, 2007.

Redesignated from Insurance Code - Not Codified, Art/Sec 21A.007 by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 921 (H.B. 3167), Sec. 9.004(a)(1), eff. September 1, 2007.

Sec. 443.008. INJUNCTIONS AND ORDERS. (a) The receivership court may issue any order, process, or judgment, including stays, injunctions, or other orders, as necessary or appropriate to carry out the provisions of this chapter or an approved rehabilitation plan.

(b) This chapter may not be construed to limit the ability of the receiver to apply to a court other than the receivership court in any jurisdiction to carry out any provision of this chapter or for the purpose of pursuing claims against any person.

(c) Except as provided by Subsection (e) or as otherwise provided by this chapter and subject to Subsection (g), the commencement of a delinquency proceeding under this chapter operates as a stay, applicable to all persons, of:

(1) the commencement or continuation, including the issuance or employment of process, of a judicial, administrative, or other action or proceeding against the insurer, including an arbitration proceeding, that was or could have been commenced before the commencement of the delinquency proceeding under this chapter, or to recover a claim against the insurer that arose before the commencement of the delinquency proceeding under this chapter;

(2) the enforcement against the insurer or against property of the insurer of a judgment obtained before the commencement of the delinquency proceeding under this chapter;

(3) any act to obtain or retain possession of property of the insurer or of property from the insurer or to exercise control over property or records of the insurer;

(4) any act to create, perfect, or enforce any lien against property of the insurer;

(5) any act to collect, assess, or recover a claim against the insurer that arose before the commencement of a delinquency proceeding under this chapter;

(6) the commencement or continuation of an action or proceeding against a reinsurer of the insurer, by the holder of a claim against the insurer, seeking reinsurance recoveries that are contractually due to the insurer; and

(7) except as provided by Subsection (e)(1), the commencement or continuation of an action or proceeding by a governmental unit to terminate or revoke an insurance license.

(d) Except as provided in Subsection (e) or as otherwise provided by this chapter, the commencement of a delinquency proceeding under this chapter operates as a stay, applicable to all persons, of any judicial, administrative, or other action or proceeding, including the enforcement of any judgment, against any insured that was or could have been commenced before the commencement of the delinquency proceeding under this chapter, or to recover a claim against the insured that arose before or after the commencement of the delinquency proceeding under this chapter and for which the insurer is or may be liable under a policy of insurance or is obligated to defend a party. The stay provided by this subsection terminates 90 days after the date of appointment of the receiver, unless, for good cause shown, the stay is extended by order of the receivership court after notice to any affected parties and any hearing the receivership court determines is appropriate.

(e) Notwithstanding Subsection (c), the commencement of a delinquency proceeding under this chapter does not operate as a stay of:

(1) regulatory actions not described by Subsection (c)(7) that are taken by the commissioners of nondomiciliary states, including the suspension of licenses;

(2) criminal proceedings;

(3) any act to perfect or to maintain or continue the perfection of an interest in property to the extent that the act is accomplished within any relation back period under applicable law;

(4) set off as permitted by Section 443.209;

(5) pursuit and enforcement of nonmonetary governmental claims, judgments, and proceedings;

(6) presentment of a negotiable instrument and the giving of notice and protesting dishonor of the instrument;

(7) enforcement of rights against single beneficiary trusts established pursuant to and in compliance with laws relating to credit for reinsurance;

(8) termination, liquidation, and netting of obligations under qualified financial contracts as provided for in Section 443.261;

(9) discharge by a guaranty association of statutory responsibilities under any law governing guaranty associations; or

(10) any of the following actions:

(A) an audit by a governmental unit to determine tax liability;

(B) the issuance to the insurer by a governmental unit of a notice of tax deficiency;

(C) a demand for tax returns; or

(D) the making of an assessment for any tax and issuance of a notice and demand for payment of the assessment.

(f) Except as provided by Subsection (h):

(1) the stay of an act against property of the insurer under Subsection (c) continues until the property is no longer property of the receivership estate; and

(2) the stay of any other act under Subsection (c) continues until the earlier of the time the delinquency proceeding is closed or dismissed.

(g) Notwithstanding the provisions of Subsection (c), claims against the insurer that arose before the commencement of the delinquency proceeding under this chapter may be asserted as a counterclaim in any judicial, administrative, or other action or proceeding initiated by or on behalf of the receiver against the holder of the claims.

(h) On request of a party in interest and after notice and any hearing the receivership court determines is appropriate, the receivership court may grant relief from the stay of Subsection (c) or (d), such as by terminating, annulling, modifying, or conditioning the stay:

(1) for cause as described by Subsection (i); or

(2) with respect to a stay of an act against property under Subsection (c) if:

(A) the insurer does not have equity in the property; and

(B) the property is not necessary to an effective rehabilitation plan.

(i) For purposes of Subsection (h), "cause" includes the receiver canceling a policy, surety bond, or surety undertaking if the creditor is entitled, by contract or by law, to require the insured or the principal to have a policy, surety bond, or surety undertaking and the insured or the principal fails to obtain a replacement policy, surety bond, or surety undertaking not later than the later of:

(1) the 30th day after the date the receiver cancels the policy, surety bond, or surety undertaking; or

(2) the time permitted by contract or law.

(j) In any hearing under Subsection (h), the party seeking relief from the stay has the burden of proof on each issue, which must be established by clear and convincing evidence.

(k) The estate of an insurer that is injured by any wilful violation of a stay provided by this section is entitled to actual damages, including costs and attorney's fees. In appropriate circumstances, the receivership court may impose additional sanctions.

(l) Any guaranty association or its designated representative may intervene as a party as a matter of right or otherwise appear and participate in any court proceeding concerning a delinquency proceeding if the association is or may become liable to act as a result of the rehabilitation or liquidation of the insurer. Exercise by any guaranty association or its designated representative of the right to intervene conferred under this subsection does not constitute grounds to establish general personal jurisdiction by the courts of this state. The intervening guaranty association or its designated representative are subject to the receivership court's jurisdiction for the limited purpose for which it intervenes.

(m) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, bond may not be required of the commissioner or receiver in relation to any stay or injunction under this section.

Added by Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 995 (H.B. 2157), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2005.

Redesignated from Insurance Code - Not Codified, Art/Sec 21A.008 by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 730 (H.B. 2636), Sec. 3B.004(a)(1), eff. September 1, 2007.

Amended by:

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 730 (H.B. 2636), Sec. 3B.004(d), eff. September 1, 2007.

Redesignated from Insurance Code - Not Codified, Art/Sec 21A.008 by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 921 (H.B. 3167), Sec. 9.004(a)(1), eff. September 1, 2007.

Amended by:

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 921 (H.B. 3167), Sec. 9.004(d), eff. September 1, 2007.

Sec. 443.009. STATUTES OF LIMITATIONS. (a) If applicable law, an order, or an agreement fixes a period within which the insurer may commence an action, and this period has not expired before the date of the filing of the initial petition in a delinquency proceeding, the receiver may commence an action only before the later of:

(1) the end of the period, including any suspension of the period occurring on or after the filing of the initial petition in a delinquency proceeding; or

(2) four years after the later of the date of entry of an order for either rehabilitation or liquidation.

(b) Except as provided by Subsection (a), if applicable law, an order, or an agreement fixes a period within which the insurer may file any pleading, demand, notice, or proof of claim or loss, cure a default in a case or proceeding, or perform any other similar act, and the period has not expired before the date of the filing of the petition initiating formal delinquency proceedings, the receiver may file, cure, or perform, as the case may be, only before the later of:

(1) the end of the period, including any suspension of the period occurring on or after the filing of the initial petition in the delinquency proceeding; or

(2) 60 days after the later of the date of entry of an order for either rehabilitation or liquidation.

(c) If applicable law, an order, or an agreement fixes a period for commencing or continuing a civil action in a court other than the receivership court on a claim against the insurer, and the period has not expired before the date of the initial filing of the petition in a delinquency proceeding, then the period does not expire until the later of:

(1) the end of the period, including any suspension of the period occurring on or after the filing of the initial petition in the delinquency proceeding; or

(2) 30 days after termination or expiration of the stay under Section 443.008 with respect to the claim.

(d) If the otherwise applicable limitations period has not expired prior to the initial filing of the petition commencing a delinquency proceeding, any other action or proceeding filed by a receiver may be commenced at any time within four years after the date upon which the cause of action accrues or four years after the date on which the receiver is appointed, whichever is later.

Added by Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 995 (H.B. 2157), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2005.

Redesignated from Insurance Code - Not Codified, Art/Sec 21A.009 by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 730 (H.B. 2636), Sec. 3B.004(a)(1), eff. September 1, 2007.

Amended by:

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 730 (H.B. 2636), Sec. 3B.004(e), eff. September 1, 2007.

Redesignated from Insurance Code - Not Codified, Art/Sec 21A.009 by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 921 (H.B. 3167), Sec. 9.004(a)(1), eff. September 1, 2007.

Amended by:

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 921 (H.B. 3167), Sec. 9.004(e), eff. September 1, 2007.

Sec. 443.010. COOPERATION OF OFFICERS, OWNERS, AND EMPLOYEES. (a) Any present or former officer, manager, director, trustee, owner, employee, or agent of any insurer, or any other persons with authority over or in charge of any segment of the insurer's affairs, shall cooperate with the commissioner or receiver in any proceeding under this chapter or any investigation preliminary to the proceeding. For purposes of this section:

(1) "person" includes any person who exercises control directly or indirectly over activities of the insurer through any holding company or other affiliate of the insurer; and

(2) "cooperate" includes:

(A) replying promptly in writing to any inquiry from the commissioner or receiver requesting the reply; and

(B) promptly making available to the commissioner or receiver any books, accounts, documents, or other records or information or property of or pertaining to the insurer and in the person's possession, custody, or control.

(b) A person may not obstruct or interfere with the commissioner or receiver in the conduct of any delinquency proceeding or any preliminary or incidental investigation.

(c) This section may not be construed to abridge otherwise existing legal rights, including the right to resist a petition for liquidation or other delinquency proceedings, or other orders.

(d) Any person described by Subsection (a) who fails to cooperate with the commissioner or receiver, or any person who obstructs or interferes with the commissioner or receiver in the conduct of any delinquency proceeding or any preliminary or incidental investigation, or who violates any order validly issued under this chapter:

(1) commits an offense; and

(2) is subject to the imposition by the commissioner of an administrative penalty not to exceed $10,000 and subject to the revocation or suspension of any licenses issued by the commissioner in accordance with Chapters 82 and 84.

(e) An offense under Subsection (d) is punishable by a fine not exceeding $10,000 or imprisonment for not more than one year, or both fine and imprisonment.

Added by Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 995 (H.B. 2157), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2005.

Redesignated from Insurance Code - Not Codified, Art/Sec 21A.010 by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 730 (H.B. 2636), Sec. 3B.004(a)(1), eff. September 1, 2007.

Redesignated from Insurance Code - Not Codified, Art/Sec 21A.010 by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 921 (H.B. 3167), Sec. 9.004(a)(1), eff. September 1, 2007.

Sec. 443.011. ACTIONS BY AND AGAINST RECEIVER. (a) An allegation by the receiver of improper or fraudulent conduct against any person may not be the basis of a defense to the enforcement of a contractual obligation owed to the insurer by a third party, unless the conduct is found to have been materially and substantially related to the contractual obligation for which enforcement is sought.

(b) A prior wrongful or negligent action of any present or former officer, manager, director, trustee, owner, employee, or agent of the insurer may not be asserted as a defense to a claim by the receiver under a theory of estoppel, comparative fault, intervening cause, proximate cause, reliance, mitigation of damages, or otherwise, except that the affirmative defense of fraud in the inducement may be asserted against the receiver in a claim based on a contract, and a principal under a surety bond or a surety undertaking is entitled to credit against any reimbursement obligation to the receiver for the value of any property pledged to secure the reimbursement obligation to the extent that the receiver has possession or control of the property or that the insurer or its agents commingled or otherwise misappropriated the property. Evidence of fraud in the inducement is admissible only if the evidence is contained in the records of the insurer.

(c) An action or inaction by the department or the insurance regulatory authorities in any state may not be asserted as a defense to a claim by the receiver.

(d) Except as provided by Subsection (e), a judgment or order entered against an insured or the insurer in contravention of any stay or injunction under this chapter, or at any time by default or collusion, may not be considered as evidence of liability or of the amount of damages in adjudicating claims filed in the estate arising out of the subject matter of the judgment or order.

(e) Subsection (d) does not apply to guaranty associations' claims for amounts paid on settlements and judgments in pursuit of their statutory obligations.

(f) The receiver may not be deemed a governmental entity for the purposes of any state law awarding fees to a litigant who prevails against a governmental entity.

Added by Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 995 (H.B. 2157), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2005.

Redesignated from Insurance Code - Not Codified, Art/Sec 21A.011 by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 730 (H.B. 2636), Sec. 3B.004(a)(1), eff. September 1, 2007.

Redesignated from Insurance Code - Not Codified, Art/Sec 21A.011 by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 921 (H.B. 3167), Sec. 9.004(a)(1), eff. September 1, 2007.

Sec. 443.012. UNRECORDED OBLIGATIONS AND DEFENSES OF AFFILIATES. (a) In any proceeding or claim by the receiver, an affiliate, controlled or controlling person, or present or former officer, manager, director, trustee, or shareholder of the insurer may not assert any defense, unless evidence of the defense was recorded in the books and records of the insurer at or about the time the events giving rise to the defense occurred and, if required by statutory accounting practices and procedures, was timely reported on the insurer's official financial statements filed with the department.

(b) An affiliate, controlled or controlling person, or present or former officer, manager, director, trustee, or shareholder of the insurer may not assert any claim, unless the obligations were recorded in the books and records of the insurer at or about the time the obligations were incurred and, if required by statutory accounting practices and procedures, were timely reported on the insurer's official financial statements filed with the department.

(c) Claims by the receiver against any affiliate, controlled or controlling person, or present or former officer, manager, director, trustee, or shareholder of the insurer based on unrecorded or unreported transactions are not barred by this section.

Added by Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 995 (H.B. 2157), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2005.

Redesignated from Insurance Code - Not Codified, Art/Sec 21A.012 by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 730 (H.B. 2636), Sec. 3B.004(a)(1), eff. September 1, 2007.

Redesignated from Insurance Code - Not Codified, Art/Sec 21A.012 by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 921 (H.B. 3167), Sec. 9.004(a)(1), eff. September 1, 2007.

Sec. 443.013. EXECUTORY CONTRACTS AND UNEXPIRED LEASES. (a) The receiver may assume or reject any executory contract or unexpired lease of the insurer.

(b) Neither the filing of a petition commencing delinquency proceedings under this chapter nor the entry of an order for a delinquency proceeding constitutes a breach or anticipatory breach of any contract or lease of the insurer.

(c) If there has been a default in an executory contract or unexpired lease of the insurer, the receiver may not assume the contract or lease unless, at the time of the assumption of the contract or lease, the receiver:

(1) cures or provides adequate assurance that the receiver will promptly cure the default; and

(2) provides adequate assurance of future performance under the contract or lease.

(d) Subsection (c) does not apply to a default that is a breach of a provision relating to:

(1) the insolvency or financial condition of the insurer at any time before the closing of the delinquency proceeding;

(2) the appointment of or taking possession by a receiver in a case under this chapter or a custodian before the commencement of the delinquency proceeding; or

(3) the satisfaction of any penalty rate or provision relating to a default arising from any failure of the insurer to perform nonmonetary obligations under the executory contract or unexpired lease.

(e) A claim arising from the rejection, under this section or a plan of rehabilitation, of an executory contract or unexpired lease of the insurer that has not been assumed shall be determined, treated, and classified as if the claim had arisen before the date of the filing of a successful petition commencing the delinquency proceeding.

Added by Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 995 (H.B. 2157), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2005.

Redesignated from Insurance Code - Not Codified, Art/Sec 21A.013 by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 730 (H.B. 2636), Sec. 3B.004(a)(1), eff. September 1, 2007.

Redesignated from Insurance Code - Not Codified, Art/Sec 21A.013 by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 921 (H.B. 3167), Sec. 9.004(a)(1), eff. September 1, 2007.

Sec. 443.0135. CONTRACTS FOR SPECIAL DEPUTIES. (a) Except as provided by Subsection (c), the receiver shall use a competitive bidding process in the selection of any special deputies appointed under Section 443.102 or 443.154. The process must include procedures to promote the participation of historically underutilized businesses that have been certified by the comptroller under Section 2161.061, Government Code.

(b) A proposal submitted in connection with a bid solicitation under Subsection (a) must describe the efforts that have been made to include historically underutilized businesses as subcontractors and the plan for using the historically underutilized businesses in the administration of the receivership estate. A special deputy appointed under Section 443.102 or 443.154 shall make a good faith effort to implement the plan and shall report to the receiver the special deputy's efforts to identify and subcontract with historically underutilized businesses.

(c) In the event of an emergency, the receiver may appoint a special deputy without soliciting competitive bids. For the purposes of this subsection, an emergency exists if:

(1) a court has made a determination described by Section 202(a)(1)(A)(iv)(I), Pub. L. No. 111-203; or

(2) the receiver concludes that the competitive bidding process would delay the appointment of a special deputy and that the delay could be hazardous to the insurer's policyholders or creditors or the general public.

Added by Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 995 (H.B. 2157), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2005.

Amended by:

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 730 (H.B. 2636), Sec. 3B.004(f), eff. September 1, 2007.

Redesignated from Insurance Code - Not Codified, Art/Sec 21A.0135 by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 921 (H.B. 3167), Sec. 9.004(a)(1), eff. September 1, 2007.

Amended by:

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 921 (H.B. 3167), Sec. 9.004(f), eff. September 1, 2007.

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 937 (H.B. 3560), Sec. 1.98, eff. September 1, 2007.

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 193 (S.B. 1433), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2011.

Sec. 443.014. IMMUNITY AND INDEMNIFICATION OF RECEIVER AND ASSISTANTS. (a) For the purposes of this section, the persons entitled to immunity and indemnification and those entitled to immunity only, as applicable, are:

(1) all present and former receivers responsible for the conduct of a delinquency proceeding under this chapter;

(2) all of the receiver's present and former assistants, including:

(A) all present and former special deputies and assistant special deputies engaged by contract or otherwise;

(B) all persons whom the receiver, special deputies, or assistant special deputies have employed to assist in a delinquency proceeding under this chapter; and

(C) any state employees acting with respect to a delinquency proceeding under this chapter; and

(3) all of the receiver's present and former contractors, including all persons with whom the receiver, special deputies, or assistant special deputies have contracted to assist in a delinquency proceeding under this chapter, including attorneys, accountants, auditors, actuaries, investment bankers, financial advisors, and any other professionals or firms who are retained or contracted with by the receiver as independent contractors and all employees of the contractors.

(b) The receiver, the receiver's assistants, and the receiver's contractors have immunity under this chapter, as described by Subsections (c) and (d).

(c) The receiver, the receiver's assistants, and the receiver's contractors are immune from suit and liability, both personally and in their representative capacities, for any claim for damage to or loss of property or personal injury or other civil liability caused by or resulting from any alleged act, error, or omission of the receiver or any assistant or contractor that arises out of or by reason of their duties or employment or is taken at the direction of the receivership court, providing that the alleged act, error, or omission is performed in good faith.

(d) Any immunity granted by this section is in addition to any immunity granted by other law.

(e) The receiver and the receiver's assistants are entitled to indemnification under this chapter, as described by Subsections (f)-(l).

(f) If any legal action is commenced against the receiver or any assistant, whether against the receiver or assistant personally or in their official capacity, alleging property damage, property loss, personal injury, or other civil liability caused by or resulting from any alleged act, error, or omission of the receiver or any assistant arising out of or by reason of their duties or employment, the receiver and any assistant are indemnified from the assets of the insurer for all expenses, attorney's fees, judgments, settlements, decrees, or amounts due and owing or paid in satisfaction of or incurred in the defense of the legal action, unless it is determined upon a final adjudication on the merits that the alleged act, error, or omission of the receiver or assistant giving rise to the claim:

(1) did not arise out of or by reason of their duties or employment; or

(2) was caused by intentional or wilful and wanton misconduct.

(g) Attorney's fees and any and all related expenses incurred in defending a legal action for which immunity or indemnity is available under this section must be paid from the assets of the insurer, as the fees and expenses are incurred, and in advance of the final disposition of the legal action upon receipt of an agreement by or on behalf of the receiver or assistant to repay the attorney's fees and expenses, if it is ultimately determined upon a final adjudication on the merits that the receiver or assistant is not entitled to immunity or indemnity under this section.

(h) Any indemnification for expense payments, judgments, settlements, decrees, attorney's fees, surety bond premiums, or other amounts paid or to be paid from the insurer's assets pursuant to this section are an administrative expense of the insurer.

(i) In the event of any actual or threatened litigation against a receiver or any assistant for whom immunity or indemnity may be available under this section, a reasonable amount of funds, which in the judgment of the receiver may be needed to provide immunity or indemnity, must be segregated and reserved from the assets of the insurer as security for the payment of indemnity until:

(1) all applicable statutes of limitation have run;

(2) all actual or threatened actions against the receiver or any assistant have been completely and finally resolved; and

(3) all obligations under this section have been satisfied.

(j) Instead of segregating and reserving funds under Subsection (i), the receiver may, in the receiver's discretion, obtain a surety bond or make other arrangements that will enable the receiver to secure fully the payment of all obligations under this section.

(k) If any legal action against an assistant for whom indemnity may be available under this section is settled prior to final adjudication on the merits, the receiver must pay the settlement amount on behalf of the assistant, or indemnify the assistant for the settlement amount, unless the receiver determines that the claim:

(1) did not arise out of or by reason of the assistant's duties or employment; or

(2) was caused by the intentional or wilful and wanton misconduct of the assistant.

(l) In any legal action in which a claim is asserted against the receiver, that portion of any settlement relating to the alleged act, error, or omission of the receiver is subject to the approval of the receivership court. The receivership court may not approve that portion of the settlement if it determines that the claim:

(1) did not arise out of or by reason of the receiver's duties or employment; or

(2) was caused by the intentional or wilful and wanton misconduct of the receiver.

(m) Nothing contained or implied in this section may operate or be construed or applied to deprive the receiver, the receiver's assistants, or receiver's contractors of any immunity, indemnity, benefits of law, rights, or defense otherwise available.

(n) The immunity and indemnification provided to the receiver's assistants and the immunity provided to the receiver's contractors under this section do not apply to any action by the receiver against that person.

(o) Subsection (b) applies to any suit based in whole or in part on any alleged act, error, or omission that takes place on or after September 1, 2005.

(p) Subsections (e)-(l) apply to any suit that is pending on or filed after September 1, 2005, without regard to when the alleged act, error, or omission took place.

Added by Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 995 (H.B. 2157), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2005.

Redesignated from Insurance Code - Not Codified, Art/Sec 21A.014 by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 730 (H.B. 2636), Sec. 3B.004(a)(1), eff. September 1, 2007.

Redesignated from Insurance Code - Not Codified, Art/Sec 21A.014 by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 921 (H.B. 3167), Sec. 9.004(a)(1), eff. September 1, 2007.

Sec. 443.015. APPROVAL AND PAYMENT OF EXPENSES. (a) The receiver may pay any expenses under contracts, leases, employment agreements, or other arrangements entered into by the insurer prior to receivership, as the receiver deems necessary for the purposes of this chapter. The receiver is not required to pay any expenses that the receiver determines are not necessary, and may reject any contract pursuant to Section 443.013.

(b) Receivership expenses other than those described in Subsection (a) must be paid in accordance with Subsections (c)-(f).

(c) The receiver shall submit to the receivership court an application pursuant to Section 443.007 to approve:

(1) the terms of compensation of each special deputy or contractor with respect to which the total amount of the compensation is reasonably expected by the receiver for the duration of the delinquency proceeding to exceed $250,000, or another amount established by the receivership court; and

(2) any other anticipated expense in excess of $25,000, or another amount established by the receivership court.

(d) The receiver may, as the receiver deems appropriate, submit an application to approve any compensation, anticipated expenses, or incurred expenses not described by Subsection (c)(1).

(e) The receiver may pay any expenses not requiring receivership court approval and any expenses approved by the rehabilitation or liquidation order as the expenses are incurred.

(f) The approval of expenses by the receivership court does not prejudice the right of the receiver to seek any recovery, recoupment, disgorgement, or reimbursement of fees based on contract or causes of action recognized in law or in equity.

(g) On a quarterly basis, or as otherwise provided by the receivership court, the receiver shall submit to the receivership court a report summarizing the expenses incurred during the period.

(h) Receivership court approval may not be required to pay expenses incurred by the receiver in connection with the appeal of an order of the receivership court.

(i) All expenses of receivership shall be paid from the assets of the insurer, except as provided by this subsection. In the event that the property of the insurer does not contain sufficient cash or liquid assets to defray the expenses incurred, the commissioner may advance funds from the account established under Section 443.304(c). Any amounts advanced shall be repaid to the account out of the first available money of the insurer.

Added by Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 995 (H.B. 2157), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2005.

Redesignated from Insurance Code - Not Codified, Art/Sec 21A.015 by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 730 (H.B. 2636), Sec. 3B.004(a)(1), eff. September 1, 2007.

Amended by:

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 730 (H.B. 2636), Sec. 3B.004(g), eff. September 1, 2007.

Redesignated from Insurance Code - Not Codified, Art/Sec 21A.015 by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 921 (H.B. 3167), Sec. 9.004(a)(1), eff. September 1, 2007.

Amended by:

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 921 (H.B. 3167), Sec. 9.004(g), eff. September 1, 2007.

Sec. 443.016. FINANCIAL REPORTING. (a) Not later than the 120th day after the date of entry of an order of receivership by the receivership court, and at least quarterly after that date, the receiver shall file a financial report with the receivership court. A financial report filed under this subsection at a minimum, must include:

(1) a statement of the assets and liabilities of the insurer;

(2) the changes in those assets and liabilities; and

(3) all funds received or disbursed by the receiver during the period covered by the report.

(b) The receivership court shall require a financial report filed under Subsection (a) to comply with all receivership financial reporting requirements specified by the National Association of Insurance Commissioners and adopted in this state by rule by the commissioner.

(c) Not later than the 120th day after the date of entry of an order of liquidation by the receivership court, and at least quarterly after that date, or at other intervals as may be agreed to between the liquidator and the guaranty associations, but in no event less than annually, each affected guaranty association shall file reports with the liquidator. The reports must be in a format compatible with that specified by the National Association of Insurance Commissioners. Reports under this subsection shall be filed with the receivership court.

Added by Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 995 (H.B. 2157), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2005.

Redesignated from Insurance Code - Not Codified, Art/Sec 21A.016 by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 730 (H.B. 2636), Sec. 3B.004(a)(1), eff. September 1, 2007.

Redesignated from Insurance Code - Not Codified, Art/Sec 21A.016 by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 921 (H.B. 3167), Sec. 9.004(a)(1), eff. September 1, 2007.

Sec. 443.017. RECORDS. (a) Upon entry of an order of rehabilitation or liquidation, the receiver is vested with title to all of the books, documents, papers, policy information, and claim files, and all other records of the insurer, of whatever nature, in whatever medium, and wherever located, regardless of whether the records are in the custody and control of a third-party administrator, managing general agent, attorney, or other representative of the insurer. The receiver may immediately take possession and control of all of the records of the insurer, and of the premises where the records are located. A third-party administrator, managing general agent, attorney, or other representative of the insurer shall release all records described by this subsection to the receiver, or the receiver's designee, at the request of the receiver. A guaranty association that has or may have obligations under a policy issued by the insurer has the right, with the receiver's approval, to take actions as are necessary to obtain directly from any third-party administrator, managing general agent, attorney, or other representative of the insurer all records described by this section that pertain to the insurer's business and that are appropriate or necessary for the guaranty association to fulfill the association's statutory obligations.

(b) The receiver has the authority to certify the records of a delinquent insurer described by Subsection (a) and the records of the receiver's office created and maintained in connection with a delinquent insurer, as follows:

(1) records of a delinquent insurer may be certified by the receiver in an affidavit stating that the records:

(A) are true and correct copies of records of the insurer; and

(B) were received from the custody of the insurer or found among its effects; and

(2) records created by or filed with the receiver's office in connection with a delinquent insurer may be certified by the receiver's affidavit stating that the records are true and correct copies of records maintained by the receiver's office.

(c) Original books, documents, papers, and other records, or copies of original records certified under Subsection (b), when admitted in evidence, are prima facie evidence of the facts disclosed.

(d) The records of a delinquent insurer held by the receiver may not be considered records of the department for any purposes, and Chapter 552, Government Code, does not apply to those records.

Added by Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 995 (H.B. 2157), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2005.

Redesignated from Insurance Code - Not Codified, Art/Sec 21A.017 by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 730 (H.B. 2636), Sec. 3B.004(a)(1), eff. September 1, 2007.

Redesignated from Insurance Code - Not Codified, Art/Sec 21A.017 by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 921 (H.B. 3167), Sec. 9.004(a)(1), eff. September 1, 2007.

SUBCHAPTER B. PROCEEDINGS

Sec. 443.051. RECEIVERSHIP COURT'S SEIZURE ORDER. (a) The commissioner may file in a district court of Travis County a petition with respect to an insurer domiciled in this state, an unauthorized insurer, or, pursuant to Section 443.401, a foreign insurer:

(1) alleging that grounds exist that would justify a court order for a formal delinquency proceeding against the insurer under this chapter;

(2) alleging that the interests of policyholders, creditors, or the public will be endangered by delay; and

(3) setting forth the contents of a seizure order deemed to be necessary by the commissioner.

(b) Upon a filing under Subsection (a), the receivership court may issue, ex parte and without notice or hearing, the requested seizure order directing the commissioner to take possession and control of all or a part of the property, books, accounts, documents, and other records of an insurer, and of the premises occupied by it for transaction of its business, and until further order of the receivership court, enjoining the insurer and its officers, managers, agents, and employees from disposition of its property and from the transaction of its business except with the written consent of the commissioner. Any person having possession or control of and refusing to deliver any of the books, records, or assets of a person against whom a seizure order has been issued commits an offense. An offense under this subsection is punishable in the manner described by Section 443.010(e).

(c) A petition that prays for injunctive relief must be verified by the commissioner or the commissioner's designee, but need not plead or prove irreparable harm or inadequate remedy at law. The commissioner shall provide only the notice as the receivership court may require.

(d) The receivership court shall specify in the seizure order the duration of the seizure order, which shall be a period the receivership court deems necessary for the commissioner to ascertain the condition of the insurer. On motion of the commissioner or the insurer, or the court's own motion, the receivership court may, from time to time, hold hearings as it deems desirable after notice as it deems appropriate, and may extend, shorten, or modify the terms of the seizure order. The receivership court shall vacate the seizure order if the commissioner fails to commence a formal delinquency proceeding under this chapter after having had a reasonable opportunity to do so. An order of the receivership court pursuant to a formal proceeding under this chapter vacates the seizure order.

(e) Entry of a seizure order under this section does not constitute a breach or an anticipatory breach of any contract of the insurer.

(f) An insurer subject to an ex parte seizure order under this section may petition the receivership court at any time after the issuance of a seizure order for a hearing and review of the seizure order. The receivership court shall hold the hearing and conduct the review not later than the 15th day after the date of the request. A hearing under this subsection may be held privately in chambers, and a hearing shall be held privately in chambers if the insurer proceeded against so requests.

(g) If, at any time after the issuance of a seizure order, it appears to the receivership court that any person whose interest is or will be substantially affected by the seizure order did not appear at the hearing and has not been served, the receivership court may order that notice be given to the person. An order that notice be given does not stay the effect of any seizure order previously issued by the receivership court.

(h) Whenever the commissioner makes any seizure as provided by Subsection (b), on the demand of the commissioner, the sheriff of any county and the police department of any municipality shall furnish the commissioner with the deputies, patrolmen, or officers as may be necessary to assist the commissioner in making and enforcing the seizure order.

(i) In all proceedings and judicial reviews under this section, all records of the insurer, department files, court records and papers, and other documents, so far as they pertain to or are a part of the record of the proceedings, are confidential, and all papers filed with the clerk of the court shall be held by the clerk in a confidential file as permitted by law, except to the extent necessary to obtain compliance with any order entered in connection with the proceedings, unless and until:

(1) the court, after hearing argument in chambers, orders otherwise;

(2) the insurer requests that the matter be made public; or

(3) the commissioner applies for an order under Section 443.057.

Added by Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 995 (H.B. 2157), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2005.

Redesignated from Insurance Code - Not Codified, Art/Sec 21A.051 by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 730 (H.B. 2636), Sec. 3B.004(a)(1), eff. September 1, 2007.

Amended by:

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 730 (H.B. 2636), Sec. 3B.004(h), eff. September 1, 2007.

Redesignated from Insurance Code - Not Codified, Art/Sec 21A.051 by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 921 (H.B. 3167), Sec. 9.004(a)(1), eff. September 1, 2007.

Amended by:

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 921 (H.B. 3167), Sec. 9.004(h), eff. September 1, 2007.

Sec. 443.052. COMMENCEMENT OF FORMAL DELINQUENCY PROCEEDING. (a) Except as authorized by Section 203(e)(3), Pub. L. No. 111-203, any formal delinquency proceeding against a person shall be commenced by filing a petition in the name of the commissioner or department.

(b) The petition must state the grounds upon which the proceeding is based and the relief requested and may include a prayer for restraining orders and injunctive relief as described in Section 443.008. On the filing of the petition or order, a copy shall be forwarded by first class mail or electronic communication as permitted by the receivership court to the insurance regulatory officials and guaranty associations in states in which the insurer did business.

(c) Any petition that prays for injunctive relief must be verified by the commissioner or the commissioner's designee, but need not plead or prove irreparable harm or inadequate remedy at law. The commissioner shall provide only the notice as the receivership court may require.

(d) If any temporary restraining order is prayed for:

(1) the receivership court may issue an initial order containing the relief requested;

(2) the receivership court shall set a time and date for the return of summons, not later than 10 days after the time and date of the issuance of the initial order, at which time the person proceeded against may appear before the receivership court for a summary hearing;

(3) the order must state the time and date of its issuance; and

(4) the order may not continue in effect beyond the time and date set for the return of summons, unless the receivership court expressly enters one or more orders extending the restraining order.

(e) If a temporary restraining order is not requested, the receivership court shall cause summons to be issued. The summons must specify a return date not later than the 30th day after the date of issuance and that an answer must be filed at or before the return date.

Added by Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 995 (H.B. 2157), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2005.

Redesignated from Insurance Code - Not Codified, Art/Sec 21A.052 by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 730 (H.B. 2636), Sec. 3B.004(a)(1), eff. September 1, 2007.

Amended by:

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 730 (H.B. 2636), Sec. 3B.004(i), eff. September 1, 2007.

Redesignated from Insurance Code - Not Codified, Art/Sec 21A.052 by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 921 (H.B. 3167), Sec. 9.004(a)(1), eff. September 1, 2007.

Amended by:

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 921 (H.B. 3167), Sec. 9.004(i), eff. September 1, 2007.

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 193 (S.B. 1433), Sec. 3, eff. September 1, 2011.

Sec. 443.053. RETURN OF SUMMONS AND SUMMARY HEARING. (a) The receivership court shall hold a summary hearing at the time and date for the return of summons on a petition to commence a formal delinquency proceeding.

(b) If a person is not served with summons on a petition to commence a formal delinquency proceeding and fails to appear for the summary hearing, the receivership court shall:

(1) continue the summary hearing not more than 10 days;

(2) provide for alternative service of summons upon the person; and

(3) extend any restraining order.

(c) Upon a showing of good faith efforts to effect personal service upon a person who has failed to appear for a continued summary hearing, the receivership court shall order notice of the petition to commence a formal delinquency proceeding to be published. The order and notice shall specify a return date not less than 10 or later than 20 days after the date of publication and that the restraining order has been extended to the continued hearing date.

(d) If a person fails to appear for a summary hearing on a petition to commence a formal delinquency proceeding after service of summons, the receivership court shall enter judgment in favor of the commissioner against that person.

(e) A person who appears for the summary hearing on a petition to commence a formal delinquency proceeding shall file the person's answer at the hearing, and the receivership court shall:

(1) determine whether to extend any temporary restraining orders pending final judgment; and

(2) set the case for trial on a date not later than 10 days after the date of the summary hearing.

(f) The receivership court may not grant a continuance for filing an answer.

Added by Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 995 (H.B. 2157), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2005.

Redesignated from Insurance Code - Not Codified, Art/Sec 21A.053 by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 730 (H.B. 2636), Sec. 3B.004(a)(1), eff. September 1, 2007.

Redesignated from Insurance Code - Not Codified, Art/Sec 21A.053 by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 921 (H.B. 3167), Sec. 9.004(a)(1), eff. September 1, 2007.

Sec. 443.054. PROCEEDINGS FOR EXPEDITED TRIAL: CONTINUANCES, DISCOVERY, EVIDENCE. (a) The receivership court shall proceed to hear the case on the petition to commence a formal delinquency proceeding at the time and date set forth for trial. To the extent practicable, the receivership court shall give precedence to the matter over all other matters. To the extent authorized by law, the receivership court may assign the matter to other judges if necessary to comply with the need for expedited proceedings under this chapter.

(b) Continuances for trial may be granted only in extreme circumstances.

(c) The receivership court shall admit into evidence, as self-authenticated, certified copies of any of the following when offered by the commissioner:

(1) the financial statements made by the insurer or an affiliate;

(2) examination reports of the insurer or an affiliate made by or on behalf of the commissioner; and

(3) any other document filed with any insurance department by the insurer or an affiliate.

(d) The facts contained in any examination report of the insurer or an affiliate made by or on behalf of the commissioner are presumed to be true as of the date of the hearing if the examination was made as of a date not more than 270 days before the date the petition was filed. The presumption is rebuttable, and shifts the burden of production and persuasion to the insurer.

(e) Discovery is limited to grounds alleged in the petition and shall be concluded on an expedited basis.

Added by Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 995 (H.B. 2157), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2005.

Redesignated from Insurance Code - Not Codified, Art/Sec 21A.054 by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 730 (H.B. 2636), Sec. 3B.004(a)(1), eff. September 1, 2007.

Redesignated from Insurance Code - Not Codified, Art/Sec 21A.054 by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 921 (H.B. 3167), Sec. 9.004(a)(1), eff. September 1, 2007.

Sec. 443.055. DECISION AND APPEALS. (a) The receivership court shall enter judgment on the petition to commence formal delinquency proceedings not later than the 15th day after the date of conclusion of the evidence.

(b) The judgment is final when entered. Any appeal must be prosecuted on an expedited basis and must be taken not later than the fifth day after the date of entry of the judgment. A request for reconsideration, review, or appeal, or posting of a bond does not dissolve or stay the judgment.

Added by Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 995 (H.B. 2157), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2005.

Redesignated from Insurance Code - Not Codified, Art/Sec 21A.055 by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 730 (H.B. 2636), Sec. 3B.004(a)(1), eff. September 1, 2007.

Redesignated from Insurance Code - Not Codified, Art/Sec 21A.055 by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 921 (H.B. 3167), Sec. 9.004(a)(1), eff. September 1, 2007.

Sec. 443.056. CONFIDENTIALITY. (a) The commissioner, rehabilitator, or liquidator may share documents, materials, or other information in the possession, custody, or control of the department without regard to the confidentiality of those documents, materials, or information, pertaining to an insurer that is the subject of a proceeding under this chapter with other state, federal, and international regulatory agencies, with the National Association of Insurance Commissioners and its affiliates and subsidiaries, with state, federal, and international law enforcement authorities, with an auditor appointed by the receivership court in accordance with Section 443.355, and, pursuant to Section 443.105, with representatives of guaranty associations that may have statutory obligations as a result of the insolvency of the insurer, provided that the recipient agrees to maintain the confidentiality, if any, of the documents, material, or other information. Nothing in this section limits the power of the commissioner to disclose information under other applicable law.

(b) A domiciliary receiver shall permit a commissioner of another state or a guaranty association to obtain a listing of policyholders and certificate holders residing in the requestor's state, including current addresses and summary policy information, provided that the commissioner of the other state or the guaranty association agrees to maintain the confidentiality of the records and agrees that the records will be used only for regulatory or guaranty association purposes. Access to records may be limited to normal business hours. In the event that the domiciliary receiver believes that certain information is sensitive and that disclosure may cause a diminution in recovery, the receiver may apply for a protective order imposing additional restrictions on access.

(c) The Texas Workers' Compensation Commission shall report to the department any information that a workers' compensation insurer has committed acts that indicate that the insurer is impaired or insolvent. A report made under this subsection is confidential under this section.

(d) The confidentiality obligations imposed by this section end upon the entry of an order of liquidation against the insurer, unless otherwise agreed to by the parties or pursuant to an order of the receivership court.

(e) A waiver of any applicable privilege or claim of confidentiality does not occur as a result of any disclosure, or any sharing of documents, materials, or other information, made pursuant to this section.

Added by Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 995 (H.B. 2157), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2005.

Redesignated from Insurance Code - Not Codified, Art/Sec 21A.056 by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 730 (H.B. 2636), Sec. 3B.004(a)(1), eff. September 1, 2007.

Amended by:

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 730 (H.B. 2636), Sec. 3B.004(j), eff. September 1, 2007.

Redesignated from Insurance Code - Not Codified, Art/Sec 21A.056 by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 921 (H.B. 3167), Sec. 9.004(a)(1), eff. September 1, 2007.

Amended by:

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 921 (H.B. 3167), Sec. 9.004(j), eff. September 1, 2007.

Sec. 443.057. GROUNDS FOR CONSERVATION, REHABILITATION, OR LIQUIDATION. A petition with respect to an insurer domiciled in this state or an unauthorized insurer for an order of rehabilitation or liquidation may be filed on any one or more of the following grounds:

(1) the insurer is impaired;

(2) the insurer is insolvent;

(3) the insurer is about to become insolvent, with "about to become insolvent" being defined as reasonably anticipated that the insurer will not have liquid assets to meet its next 90 days' current obligations;

(4) the insurer has neglected or refused to comply with an order of the commissioner to make good within the time prescribed by law any deficiency, whenever its capital and minimum required surplus, if a stock company, or its surplus, if a company other than stock, has become impaired;

(5) the insurer, its parent company, its subsidiaries, or its affiliates have converted, wasted, or concealed property of the insurer or have otherwise improperly disposed of, dissipated, used, released, transferred, sold, assigned, hypothecated, or removed the property of the insurer;

(6) the insurer is in a condition such that it could not meet the requirements for organization and authorization as required by law, except as to the amount of the original surplus required of a stock company under Title 6, and except as to the amount of the surplus required of a company other than a stock company in excess of the minimum surplus required to be maintained;

(7) the insurer, its parent company, its subsidiaries, or its affiliates have concealed, removed, altered, destroyed, or failed to establish and maintain books, records, documents, accounts, vouchers, and other pertinent material adequate for the determination of the financial condition of the insurer by examination under Chapter 401 or has failed to properly administer claims or maintain claims records that are adequate for the determination of its outstanding claims liability;

(8) at any time after the issuance of an order under Section 404.003 or Chapter 441, or at the time of instituting any proceeding under this chapter, it appears to the commissioner that, upon good cause shown, it would not be in the best interest of the policyholders, creditors, or the public to proceed with the conduct of the business of the insurer;

(9) the insurer is in a condition such that the further transaction of business would be hazardous financially, according to Subchapter A, Chapter 404, or otherwise, to its policyholders, creditors, or the public;

(10) there is reasonable cause to believe that there has been embezzlement from the insurer, wrongful sequestration or diversion of the insurer's property, forgery or fraud affecting the insurer, or other illegal conduct in, by, or with respect to the insurer that, if established, would endanger assets in an amount threatening the solvency of the insurer;

(11) control of the insurer is in a person who is:

(A) dishonest or untrustworthy; or

(B) so lacking in insurance company managerial experience or capability as to be hazardous to policyholders, creditors, or the public;

(12) any person who in fact has executive authority in the insurer, whether an officer, manager, general agent, director, trustee, employee, shareholder, or other person, has refused to be examined under oath by the commissioner concerning the insurer's affairs, whether in this state or elsewhere or if examined under oath, refuses to divulge pertinent information reasonably known to the person; and after reasonable notice of the fact, the insurer has failed promptly and effectively to terminate the employment and status of the person and all the person's influence on management;

(13) after demand by the commissioner under Chapter 401 or under this chapter, the insurer has failed promptly to make available for examination any of its own property, books, accounts, documents, or other records, or those of any subsidiary or related company within the control of the insurer or of any person having executive authority in the insurer, so far as they pertain to the insurer;

(14) without first obtaining the written consent of the commissioner, the insurer has transferred, or attempted to transfer, in a manner contrary to Chapter 823 or any law relating to bulk reinsurance, substantially its entire property or business, or has entered into any transaction the effect of which is to merge, consolidate, or reinsure substantially its entire property or business in or with the property or business of any other person;

(15) the insurer or its property has been or is the subject of an application for the appointment of a receiver, trustee, custodian, conservator, sequestrator, or similar fiduciary of the insurer or its property otherwise than as authorized under the insurance laws of this state;

(16) within the previous five years, the insurer has wilfully and continuously violated its charter, articles of incorporation or bylaws, any insurance law of this state, or any valid order of the commissioner;

(17) the insurer has failed to pay within 60 days after the due date any obligation to any state or political subdivision of a state or any judgment entered in any state, if the court in which the judgment was entered had jurisdiction over the subject matter, except that nonpayment is not a ground until 60 days after any good faith effort by the insurer to contest the obligation has been terminated, whether it is before the commissioner or in the courts;

(18) the insurer has systematically engaged in the practice of reaching settlements with and obtaining releases from claimants, and then unreasonably delayed payment, failed to pay the agreed-upon settlements, or systematically attempted to compromise with claimants or other creditors on the ground that it is financially unable to pay its claims or obligations in full;

(19) the insurer has failed to file its annual report or other financial report required by statute within the time allowed by law;

(20) the board of directors or the holders of a majority of the shares entitled to vote, or a majority of those individuals entitled to the control of those entities specified by Section 443.003, request or consent to rehabilitation or liquidation under this chapter;

(21) the insurer does not comply with its domiciliary state's requirements for issuance to it of a certificate of authority, or its certificate of authority has been revoked by its state of domicile;

(22) when authorized by department rules; or

(23) a court has made a determination described by Section 202(a)(1)(A)(iv)(I), Pub. L. No. 111-203.

Amended by:

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 730 (H.B. 2636), Sec. 3B.004(k), eff. September 1, 2007.

Redesignated from Insurance Code - Not Codified, Art/Sec 21A.057 by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 921 (H.B. 3167), Sec. 9.004(a)(1), eff. September 1, 2007.

Amended by:

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 921 (H.B. 3167), Sec. 9.004(k), eff. September 1, 2007.

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 193 (S.B. 1433), Sec. 4, eff. September 1, 2011.

Sec. 443.058. ENTRY OF ORDER. If any of the grounds provided in Section 443.057 are established, the receivership court shall grant the petition and issue the order of rehabilitation or liquidation requested in the petition.

Amended by:

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 730 (H.B. 2636), Sec. 3B.004(l), eff. September 1, 2007.

Redesignated from Insurance Code - Not Codified, Art/Sec 21A.058 by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 921 (H.B. 3167), Sec. 9.004(a)(1), eff. September 1, 2007.

Amended by:

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 921 (H.B. 3167), Sec. 9.004(l), eff. September 1, 2007.

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 193 (S.B. 1433), Sec. 5, eff. September 1, 2011.

Sec. 443.059. EFFECT OF PETITION OR ORDER ON CONTRACT OR LEASE. Neither the filing of a petition under this chapter nor the entry of any order of seizure, rehabilitation, or liquidation constitutes a breach or an anticipatory breach of any contract or lease of the insurer.

Added by Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 995 (H.B. 2157), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2005.

Redesignated from Insurance Code - Not Codified, Art/Sec 21A.059 by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 730 (H.B. 2636), Sec. 3B.004(a)(1), eff. September 1, 2007.

Redesignated from Insurance Code - Not Codified, Art/Sec 21A.059 by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 921 (H.B. 3167), Sec. 9.004(a)(1), eff. September 1, 2007.

SUBCHAPTER C. REHABILITATION

Sec. 443.101. REHABILITATION ORDERS. (a) An order to rehabilitate the business of an insurer must appoint the commissioner and the commissioner's successors in office as the rehabilitator and must direct the rehabilitator to take possession of the property of the insurer wherever located and to administer it subject to this chapter. The rehabilitator is entitled to request the receivership court to appoint a single judge to supervise the rehabilitation and hear any cases or controversies arising out of or related to the rehabilitation. Rehabilitation proceedings are exempt from any dormancy or similar program maintained by the receivership court for the early closure of civil actions. The filing or recording of the order with the clerk of the court or recorder of deeds of the county in which the principal business of the company is conducted, or, in the case of real estate, the county in which its principal office or place of business is located, imparts the same notice as a deed, bill of sale, or other evidence of title filed or recorded with the recorder of deeds would impart. The order to rehabilitate the insurer must, by operation of law, vest title to all property of the insurer in the rehabilitator.

(b) Any order issued under this section must require accountings to the receivership court by the rehabilitator. Accountings must be at the intervals specified by the receivership court in its order, but not less frequently than semi-annually. Each accounting must include a report concerning the rehabilitator's opinion as to the likelihood that a plan under Section 443.103 will be prepared by the rehabilitator and the timetable for doing so.

(c) In recognition of the need for a prompt and final resolution for all persons affected by a plan of rehabilitation, any appeal from an order of rehabilitation or an order approving a plan of rehabilitation must be heard on an expedited basis. A stay of an order of rehabilitation or an order approving a plan of rehabilitation may not be granted unless the appellant demonstrates that extraordinary circumstances warrant delaying the recovery under the plan of rehabilitation of all other persons, including policyholders. If the plan provides an appropriate mechanism for adjustment in the event of any adverse ruling from an appeal, a stay may not be granted.

Added by Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 995 (H.B. 2157), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2005.

Redesignated from Insurance Code - Not Codified, Art/Sec 21A.101 by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 730 (H.B. 2636), Sec. 3B.004(a)(1), eff. September 1, 2007.

Amended by:

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 730 (H.B. 2636), Sec. 3B.004(m), eff. September 1, 2007.

Redesignated from Insurance Code - Not Codified, Art/Sec 21A.101 by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 921 (H.B. 3167), Sec. 9.004(a)(1), eff. September 1, 2007.

Amended by:

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 921 (H.B. 3167), Sec. 9.004(m), eff. September 1, 2007.

Sec. 443.102. POWERS AND DUTIES OF REHABILITATOR. (a) The rehabilitator may appoint one or more special deputies. A special deputy serves at the pleasure of the rehabilitator and has all the powers and responsibilities of the rehabilitator granted under this section, unless specifically limited by the rehabilitator. The rehabilitator may employ or contract with legal counsel, actuaries, accountants, appraisers, consultants, clerks, assistants, and other personnel as may be deemed necessary. Any special deputy or any other person with whom the rehabilitator contracts under this subsection may act on behalf of the commissioner only in the commissioner's capacity as rehabilitator. Any person with whom the rehabilitator contracts under this subsection is not considered an agent of the state, and any contract entered into under this subsection does not constitute a contract with the state. The provisions of any law governing the procurement of goods and services by the state does not apply to any contract entered into by the commissioner as rehabilitator. The compensation of any special deputies, employees, and contractors and all expenses of taking possession of the insurer and of conducting the rehabilitation shall be fixed by the rehabilitator, with the approval of the receivership court in accordance with Section 443.015, and shall be paid out of the property of the insurer. The persons appointed under this subsection serve at the pleasure of the rehabilitator. If the rehabilitator deems it necessary to the proper performance of the rehabilitator's duties under this chapter, the rehabilitator may appoint an advisory committee of policyholders, claimants, or other creditors, including guaranty associations. The advisory committee serves at the pleasure of the rehabilitator and without compensation or reimbursement for expenses. The rehabilitator or the receivership court in rehabilitation proceedings conducted under this chapter may not appoint another committee of any nature.

(b) The rehabilitator may take action as the rehabilitator deems necessary or appropriate to reform and revitalize the insurer, including canceling policies, insurance and reinsurance contracts other than life or health insurance or annuities, or surety bonds or surety undertakings or transferring policies, insurance and reinsurance contracts, or surety bonds or surety undertakings to a solvent assuming insurer, with court approval. The rehabilitator has all the powers of the directors, officers, and managers of the insurer, whose authority is suspended, except as redelegated by the rehabilitator. The rehabilitator has full power to direct and manage, hire and discharge employees, and deal with the property and business of the insurer.

(c) If it appears to the rehabilitator that there has been criminal or tortious conduct or breach of any contractual or fiduciary obligation detrimental to the insurer by any officer, manager, agent, broker, employee, affiliate or other person, the rehabilitator may pursue all appropriate legal remedies on behalf of the insurer.

(d) The rehabilitator may assert all defenses available to the insurer as against third persons, including statutes of limitations, statutes of frauds, and the defense of usury. A waiver of any defense by the insurer after a petition under this chapter has been filed does not bind the rehabilitator.

(e) The enumeration, in this section, of the powers and authority of the rehabilitator may not be construed as a limitation upon the rehabilitator, nor shall it exclude in any manner the right to do other acts not specifically enumerated or otherwise provided for, as may be necessary or appropriate for the accomplishment of or in aid of the purpose of rehabilitation.

(f) The rehabilitator may exercise all powers:

(1) possessed on August 31, 2005, by a receiver appointed for the purpose of rehabilitating an insurer; or

(2) conferred on a rehabilitator after that date by the laws of this state that are not inconsistent with this chapter.

Added by Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 995 (H.B. 2157), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2005.

Redesignated from Insurance Code - Not Codified, Art/Sec 21A.102 by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 730 (H.B. 2636), Sec. 3B.004(a)(1), eff. September 1, 2007.

Amended by:

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 730 (H.B. 2636), Sec. 3B.004(n), eff. September 1, 2007.

Redesignated from Insurance Code - Not Codified, Art/Sec 21A.102 by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 921 (H.B. 3167), Sec. 9.004(a)(1), eff. September 1, 2007.

Amended by:

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 921 (H.B. 3167), Sec. 9.004(n), eff. September 1, 2007.

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 193 (S.B. 1433), Sec. 6, eff. September 1, 2011.

Sec. 443.103. REHABILITATION PLANS. (a) The rehabilitator shall prepare and file a plan to effect rehabilitation with the receivership court not later than the first anniversary of the entry of the rehabilitation order or another further time as the receivership court may allow. Upon application of the rehabilitator for approval of the plan, and after the notice and hearings the receivership court may prescribe, the receivership court may approve or disapprove the proposed plan or may modify it and approve it as modified. Any plan approved under this section must be, in the judgment of the receivership court, fair and equitable to all parties concerned. If the plan is approved, the rehabilitator shall carry out the plan. A plan for a life insurer may propose imposition of a moratorium upon loan and cash surrender rights under policies, for a period not to exceed one year from the entry of the rehabilitation order approving the rehabilitation plan, unless the receivership court, for good cause shown, extends the moratorium.

(b) Once a plan has been filed, any party in interest may object to the plan.

(c) A plan must:

(1) except as provided by Subsection (e), provide no less favorable treatment of a claim or class of claims than would occur in liquidation, unless the holder of a particular claim or interest agrees to a less favorable treatment of that particular claim or interest;

(2) provide adequate means for the plan's implementation;

(3) contain information concerning the financial condition of the insurer and the operation and effect of the plan, as far as is reasonably practicable in light of the nature and history of the insurer, the condition of the insurer's books and records, and the nature of the plan; and

(4) provide for the disposition of the books, records, documents, and other information relevant to the duties and obligations covered by the plan.

(d) A plan may include any other provision not inconsistent with the provisions of this chapter, including:

(1) payment of distributions;

(2) assumption or reinsurance of all or a portion of the insurer's remaining liabilities by, and transfer of assets and related books and records to, an authorized insurer or other entity;

(3) to the extent appropriate, application of insurance company regulatory market conduct standards to any entity administering claims on behalf of the receiver or assuming direct liabilities of the insurer;

(4) contracting with a state guaranty association or any other qualified entity to perform the administration of claims;

(5) annual independent financial and performance audits of any entity administering claims on behalf of the receiver that is not otherwise subject to examination pursuant to state insurance law; and

(6) termination of the insurer's liabilities other than those under policies of insurance as of a date certain.

(e) A plan may designate and separately treat one or more separate subclasses of claims consisting only of claims within the subclasses that are for or reduced to de minimis amounts. For purposes of this subsection, a "de minimis amount" means any amount equal to or less than a maximum de minimis amount approved by the receivership court as being reasonable and necessary for administrative convenience.

Added by Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 995 (H.B. 2157), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2005.

Redesignated from Insurance Code - Not Codified, Art/Sec 21A.103 by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 730 (H.B. 2636), Sec. 3B.004(a)(1), eff. September 1, 2007.

Redesignated from Insurance Code - Not Codified, Art/Sec 21A.103 by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 921 (H.B. 3167), Sec. 9.004(a)(1), eff. September 1, 2007.

Sec. 443.104. TERMINATION OF REHABILITATION. (a) When the rehabilitator believes further attempts to rehabilitate an insurer would substantially increase the risk of loss to creditors, policyholders, or the public or would be futile, the rehabilitator may move for an order of liquidation. In accordance with Section 443.105, the rehabilitator or the rehabilitator's designated representative shall coordinate with the guaranty associations that may become liable as a result of the liquidation and any national association of guaranty associations to plan for transition to liquidation.

(b) Because the protection of the interests of insureds, claimants, and the public requires the timely performance of all insurance policy obligations, if the payment of policy obligations is suspended in substantial part for a period of six months at any time after the appointment of the rehabilitator and the rehabilitator has not filed an application for approval of a plan under Section 443.103, the rehabilitator shall petition the receivership court for an order of liquidation.

(c) The rehabilitator or the directors of the insurer may at any time petition the receivership court for, or the receivership court on its own motion may enter, an order terminating rehabilitation of an insurer. Subject to the provisions of Section 443.351, if the receivership court finds that rehabilitation has been accomplished and that grounds for rehabilitation under Section 443.057 no longer exist, it shall order that the insurer be restored to title and possession of its property and the control of the business.

Amended by:

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 730 (H.B. 2636), Sec. 3B.004(o), eff. September 1, 2007.

Redesignated from Insurance Code - Not Codified, Art/Sec 21A.104 by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 921 (H.B. 3167), Sec. 9.004(a)(1), eff. September 1, 2007.

Amended by:

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 921 (H.B. 3167), Sec. 9.004(o), eff. September 1, 2007.

Sec. 443.105. COORDINATION WITH GUARANTY ASSOCIATIONS. (a) The receiver shall notify any potentially obligated guaranty association or the guaranty association's representative concerning the entry of a rehabilitation order and shall update the guaranty association or its representative regarding significant developments that impact efforts to rehabilitate the insurer. On a determination by the rehabilitator that rehabilitation efforts may not be successful, the rehabilitator shall participate in cooperative efforts with the potentially obligated guaranty associations. To facilitate an orderly transition to liquidation, the rehabilitator shall make available to the guaranty associations the information necessary to discharge their responsibilities upon becoming statutorily obligated. To the extent that information is available, or as it becomes available, the rehabilitator shall provide appropriate information to guaranty associations in the states in which the insurer transacted business.

(b) For the purposes of Subsection (a), "appropriate information" may include the following for lines of business written by the insurer, whether covered or not covered by guaranty associations:

(1) a general description of the different types of business written or assumed by the insurer;

(2) claim counts and policy counts by state and by line of business;

(3) claim and policy reserves;

(4) account values and cash surrender values;

(5) policy loans;

(6) interest crediting history;

(7) premiums and mode of payment;

(8) unpaid claims and amounts;

(9) sample policies and endorsements;

(10) a listing of different locations of claim files;

(11) if third-party administrators were used, copies of executed contracts and a description of the contractual arrangements; and

(12) information concerning claims in litigation or dispute, including a listing of claims with assigned defense counsel for those claims going to trial in the near future after a possible liquidation date.

(c) For the purposes of Subsection (a), "appropriate information" also includes information concerning states in which the insurer is or was licensed and periods for which the insurer is or was licensed and other information reasonably requested by a guaranty association necessary for the guaranty association to fulfill its statutory duties.

(d) In the case of a property and casualty insurer, the rehabilitator, in cooperation with the guaranty associations, shall make all reasonable efforts to prepare the insurer's electronic policy and claims data so that, upon the entry of an order of liquidation, the data will be ready for transmission using the Uniform Data Standards as promulgated by the National Association of Insurance Commissioners.

(e) The list of what appropriate information includes under Subsections (b) and (c) is not necessarily an exclusive list. Other information may be necessary to ensure that an orderly transition to liquidation occurs, and that information may be appropriately provided by the receiver.

Added by Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 995 (H.B. 2157), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2005.

Redesignated from Insurance Code - Not Codified, Art/Sec 21A.105 by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 730 (H.B. 2636), Sec. 3B.004(a)(1), eff. September 1, 2007.

Redesignated from Insurance Code - Not Codified, Art/Sec 21A.105 by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 921 (H.B. 3167), Sec. 9.004(a)(1), eff. September 1, 2007.

SUBCHAPTER D. LIQUIDATION

Sec. 443.151. LIQUIDATION ORDERS. (a) An order to liquidate the business of an insurer shall appoint the commissioner and any successor in office as the liquidator and shall direct the liquidator to take possession of the property of the insurer and to administer it subject to this chapter. The liquidator is entitled to request the receivership court to appoint a single judge to supervise the liquidation and to hear any cases or controversies arising out of or related to the liquidation. Liquidation proceedings are exempt from any dormancy or similar program maintained by the receivership court for the early closure of civil actions. As of the entry of the final order of liquidation, the liquidator is vested by operation of law with the title to all of the property, contracts, rights of action, and books and records of the insurer ordered liquidated, wherever located. The filing or recording of the order with the clerk of the court and the recorder of deeds of the county in which the insurer's principal office or place of business is located or, in the case of real estate, the county where the property is located, imparts the same notice as a deed, bill of sale, or other evidence of title filed or recorded with that recorder of deeds would impart.

(b) Upon issuance of the order of liquidation, the rights and liabilities of the insurer and of its creditors, policyholders, shareholders, members, and all other persons interested in its estate become fixed as of the date of entry of the order of liquidation, except as provided by Sections 443.152 and 443.255, unless otherwise fixed by the court.

(c) An order to liquidate the business of an alien insurer in this state must be in the same terms and has the same legal effect as an order to liquidate a domestic insurer.

(d) At the time of petitioning for an order of liquidation, or at any time after petitioning, the commissioner may petition the receivership court for a judicial declaration of insolvency. After providing the notice and hearing as it deems proper, the receivership court may make the declaration of insolvency.

(e) In the event an order of liquidation is set aside on appeal, the company may not be released from delinquency proceedings except in accordance with Section 443.351.

Added by Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 995 (H.B. 2157), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2005.

Redesignated from Insurance Code - Not Codified, Art/Sec 21A.151 by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 730 (H.B. 2636), Sec. 3B.004(a)(1), eff. September 1, 2007.

Amended by:

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 730 (H.B. 2636), Sec. 3B.004(p), eff. September 1, 2007.

Redesignated from Insurance Code - Not Codified, Art/Sec 21A.151 by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 921 (H.B. 3167), Sec. 9.004(a)(1), eff. September 1, 2007.

Amended by:

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 921 (H.B. 3167), Sec. 9.004(p), eff. September 1, 2007.

Sec. 443.152. CONTINUANCE OF COVERAGE. (a) Notwithstanding any policy or contract language or any other statute, all reinsurance contracts by which the insurer has assumed the insurance obligations of another insurer are canceled upon entry of an order of liquidation.

(b) Notwithstanding any policy or contract language or any other statute, all policies, insurance contracts other than reinsurance by which the insurer has ceded insurance obligations to another person, and surety bonds or surety undertakings, other than life or health insurance or annuities, in effect at the time of issuance of an order of liquidation, unless further extended by the receiver with the approval of the receivership court, continue in force only until the earlier of:

(1) the 30th day after the date of entry of the liquidation order;

(2) the date of expiration of the policy coverage;

(3) the date the insured has replaced the insurance coverage with equivalent insurance with another insurer or otherwise terminated the policy;

(4) the date the liquidator has effected a transfer of the policy obligation pursuant to Section 443.154(h); or

(5) the date proposed by the liquidator and approved by the receivership court to cancel coverage.

(c) An order of liquidation under Section 443.151 must terminate coverages at the time specified by Subsections (a) and (b) for purposes of any other statute.

(d) Policies of life or health insurance or annuities covered by a guaranty association and any portion of policies of life or health insurance or annuities covered by a guaranty association continue in force for the period and under the terms provided for by any applicable guaranty association law. Policies of life or health insurance or annuities not covered by a guaranty association and any portion of policies of life or health insurance or annuities not covered by a guaranty association terminate under Subsection (b), except to the extent the liquidator proposes and the receivership court approves the use of property of the estate, consistent with Section 443.301, for the purpose of continuing the contracts or coverage by transferring them to an assuming reinsurer.

(e) The cancellation of any bond or surety undertaking does not release any cosurety or guarantor.

(f) The obligations of the insolvent insurer's reinsurers are not released or discharged by a cancellation under this section.

Added by Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 995 (H.B. 2157), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2005.

Redesignated from Insurance Code - Not Codified, Art/Sec 21A.152 by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 730 (H.B. 2636), Sec. 3B.004(a)(1), eff. September 1, 2007.

Amended by:

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 730 (H.B. 2636), Sec. 3B.004(q), eff. September 1, 2007.

Redesignated from Insurance Code - Not Codified, Art/Sec 21A.152 by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 921 (H.B. 3167), Sec. 9.004(a)(1), eff. September 1, 2007.

Amended by:

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 921 (H.B. 3167), Sec. 9.004(q), eff. September 1, 2007.

Sec. 443.153. SALE OR DISSOLUTION OF INSURER'S CORPORATE ENTITY. (a) Notwithstanding the entry of a liquidation order, the liquidator may apply for an order to sell or dissolve the corporate entity or charter of a domestic insurer or the United States branch of an alien insurer domiciled in this state at any time after an order of liquidation of the insurer has been granted, consistent with the provisions of this section.

(b) Upon an application to sell the corporate entity or charter, with notice as prescribed in this chapter, the receivership court may enter an order:

(1) separating the corporate entity or charter, together with any of its licenses to do business and the assets the liquidator deems appropriate to the transaction, from the remaining estate in liquidation and all of the remaining estate's assets and the claims or interests of all claimants, creditors, policyholders, and stockholders;

(2) canceling all outstanding stock and other securities of and other equity interests in the corporate entity or charter, provided that the cancellation may not affect any claim against the estate by a holder of an equity interest;

(3) authorizing the issuance and sale of new stock or other securities for the purpose of transferring to one or more buyers control and ownership of the corporate entity or charter; and

(4) authorizing the sale of the corporate entity or charter, together with any of its authorizations or licenses to do business and the general assets of the estate the liquidator deems to be appropriate to the transaction, free and clear from the claims or interest of all claimants, creditors, policyholders, and stockholders.

(c) The sale of the corporate entity or charter may be made in the manner and on the terms and conditions applied for by the liquidator and ordered by the receivership court. Any sale is subject to the domiciliary state's laws regarding acquisition of an insurer, Chapter 823, and any other law regarding the transfer of control of insurers. The proceeds from the sale of the corporate entity or charter become a part of the property of the estate in liquidation. The separate corporate entity or charter, together with any of its authorizations or licenses to do business and such assets as the liquidator deems appropriate to the transaction, are, following the sale of the corporate entity or charter, free and clear from the claims or interest of all claimants, creditors, policyholders, and stockholders of the corporation in liquidation.

(d) This section shall be liberally construed to accomplish its purposes to:

(1) provide an expeditious and effective procedure to realize the maximum proceeds possible from the sale of a corporate entity or charter separated from an estate in liquidation; and

(2) ensure that the purchasers receive clear and marketable titles.

(e) If permission to sell the corporate entity or charter is not granted prior to discharge of the liquidator, in accordance with this section or otherwise with receivership court approval:

(1) the receivership court may order dissolution of the corporate entity or charter;

(2) dissolution shall be deemed complete by operation of law upon the discharge of the liquidator if the insurer is insolvent; or

(3) dissolution may be ordered by the receivership court upon the discharge of the liquidator if the insurer is under a liquidation order for some other reason.

Added by Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 995 (H.B. 2157), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2005.

Redesignated from Insurance Code - Not Codified, Art/Sec 21A.153 by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 730 (H.B. 2636), Sec. 3B.004(a)(1), eff. September 1, 2007.

Redesignated from Insurance Code - Not Codified, Art/Sec 21A.153 by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 921 (H.B. 3167), Sec. 9.004(a)(1), eff. September 1, 2007.

Sec. 443.154. POWERS OF LIQUIDATOR. (a) The liquidator may appoint a special deputy or deputies to act for the liquidator under this chapter and employ or contract with legal counsel, actuaries, accountants, appraisers, consultants, clerks, assistants, and other personnel the liquidator may deem necessary to assist in the liquidation. A special deputy has all powers of the liquidator granted by this section, unless specifically limited by the liquidator, and serves at the pleasure of the liquidator. A special deputy or any other person with whom the liquidator contracts under this subsection may act on behalf of the commissioner only in the commissioner's capacity as liquidator. Any person with whom the liquidator contracts is not considered to be an agent of the state and any contract under this subsection is not a contract with the state. The provisions of any law governing the procurement of goods and services by the state do not apply to any contract entered into by the commissioner as liquidator. This subsection does not waive any immunity granted by Section 443.014 or create any cause of action against the state.

(b) The liquidator may determine the reasonable compensation for any special deputies, employees, or contractors retained by the liquidator as provided in Subsection (a) and pay compensation in accordance with Section 443.015.

(c) The liquidator may appoint, with the approval of the receivership court, an advisory committee of policyholders, claimants, or other creditors, including guaranty associations, if the committee be deemed necessary. The advisory committee serves at the pleasure of the liquidator, and the decision to appoint an advisory committee is at the sole discretion of the liquidator. The advisory committee serves without compensation or reimbursement for expenses. The liquidator or the receivership court in liquidation proceedings conducted under this chapter may not appoint another committee of any nature.

(d) The liquidator may hold hearings, subpoena witnesses to compel their attendance, administer oaths, examine any person under oath, compel any persons to subscribe to their testimony after it has been correctly reduced to writing, and, in connection with a power under this subsection, require the production of any books, papers, records, or other documents that the liquidator deems relevant to the inquiry.

(e) The liquidator may audit the books and records of all agents of the insurer to the extent that those books and records relate to the business activities of the insurer.

(f) The liquidator may collect all debts and moneys due and claims belonging to the insurer, wherever located, and may:

(1) institute action in other jurisdictions, in order to forestall garnishment and attachment proceedings against the debts;

(2) do other acts as necessary or expedient to collect, conserve, or protect the insurer's property, including the power to sell, compromise, or assign debts for purposes of collection upon such terms and conditions as the liquidator deems consistent with this chapter; and

(3) pursue any creditor's remedies available to enforce the insurer's claims.

(g) The liquidator may conduct public and private sales of the property of the insurer.

(h) The liquidator may use property of the estate of an insurer under a liquidation order to transfer to a solvent assuming insurer policy obligations or the insurer's obligations under surety bonds and surety undertakings as well as collateral held by the insurer with respect to the reimbursement obligations of the principals under those surety bonds and surety undertakings, if the transfer can be arranged without prejudice to applicable priorities under Section 443.301. If all insureds, principals, third-party claimants, and obligees under the policies, surety bonds, and surety undertakings consent or if the receivership court so orders, the estate has no further liability under the transferred policies, surety bonds, or surety undertakings after the transfer is made.

(i) The liquidator may, subject to Subsection (y), acquire, hypothecate, encumber, lease, improve, sell, transfer, abandon, or otherwise dispose of or deal with any property of the estate at its market value or upon terms and conditions that are fair and reasonable. The liquidator also has the power to execute, acknowledge, and deliver any and all deeds, assignments, releases, and other instruments necessary or proper to effectuate any sale of property or other transaction in connection with the liquidation.

(j) The liquidator may borrow money on the security of the property of the estate or without security and execute and deliver all documents necessary to that transaction for the purpose of facilitating the liquidation. Any funds borrowed under this subsection may be repaid as an administrative expense and have priority over any other claims in Class 1 under the priority of distribution.

(k) The liquidator may enter into contracts as necessary to carry out the order to liquidate and, subject to the provisions of Section 443.013, may assume or reject any executory contract or unexpired lease to which the insurer is a party.

(l) The liquidator may continue to prosecute and institute in the name of the insurer or in the liquidator's own name any and all suits and other legal proceedings, in this state or elsewhere, and abandon the prosecution of claims the liquidator deems unprofitable to pursue further. If the insurer is dissolved under Section 443.153, the liquidator has the power to apply to any court in this state or elsewhere for leave to substitute the liquidator for the insurer as a party.

(m) The liquidator may prosecute any action that may exist on behalf of the creditors, members, policyholders, shareholders of the insurer, or the public against any person, except to the extent that a claim is personal to a specific creditor, member, policyholder, or shareholder and recovery on such claim would not inure to the benefit of the estate. This subsection does not infringe or impair any of the rights provided to a guaranty association pursuant to its enabling statute or otherwise.

(n) The liquidator may take possession of the records and property of the insurer as may be convenient for the purposes of efficient and orderly execution of the liquidation. Guaranty associations must be allowed reasonable access to the records of the insurer as is necessary for the guaranty associations to carry out their statutory obligations.

(o) The liquidator may deposit in one or more banks in this state the amounts that are required for meeting current administration expenses and dividend distributions.

(p) The liquidator may invest all amounts not currently needed, unless the receivership court orders otherwise.

(q) The liquidator may file any necessary documents for record in the office of any recorder of deeds or record office in this state or elsewhere where property of the insurer is located.

(r) The liquidator may assert all defenses available to the insurer as against third persons, including statutes of limitation, statutes of frauds, and the defense of usury. A waiver of any defense by the insurer after a petition is filed under this chapter does not bind the liquidator. When a guaranty association has an obligation to defend any suit, the liquidator shall defer to the association's obligation.

(s) The liquidator may exercise and enforce all the rights, remedies, and powers of any creditor, shareholder, policyholder, or member, including any power to avoid any transfer or lien that may be avoidable under this chapter or otherwise.

(t) The liquidator may intervene in any proceeding wherever instituted that might lead to the appointment of a receiver or trustee and act as the receiver or trustee whenever the appointment is offered.

(u) The liquidator may enter into agreements with any receivers or commissioners of any other states.

(v) The liquidator may exercise all powers held by receivers on August 31, 2005, or conferred on receivers after that date by the laws of this state not inconsistent with this chapter.

(w) The liquidator is vested with all the rights of the entity or entities in receivership.

(x) The enumeration, in this section, of the powers and authority of the liquidator may not be construed as a limitation upon the liquidator, nor may it exclude in any manner the right to do other acts not specifically enumerated or otherwise provided for, to the extent necessary or appropriate for the accomplishment of or in aid of the purpose of liquidation.

(y) The liquidator may hypothecate, encumber, lease, sell, transfer, abandon, or otherwise dispose of or deal with any property of the insurer, settle or resolve any claim brought by the liquidator on behalf of the insurer, or commute or settle any claim of reinsurance under any contract of reinsurance, as follows:

(1) if the property or claim has a market or settlement value that does not exceed the lesser of $1 million or 10 percent of the general assets of the estate as shown on the receivership's financial statements, the liquidator may take action at the liquidator's discretion, provided that the receivership court may, upon petition of the liquidator, increase the threshold upon a showing that compliance with this requirement is burdensome to the liquidator in administering the estate and is unnecessary to protect the material interests of creditors;

(2) in all instances other than those described in Subdivision (1), the liquidator may take the action only after obtaining approval of the receivership court as provided by Section 443.007;

(3) the liquidator may, at the liquidator's discretion, request the receivership court to approve a proposed action as provided by Section 443.007 if the value of the property or claim appears to be less than the threshold provided by Subdivision (1) but cannot be ascertained with certainty, or for any other reason as determined by the liquidator; and

(4) after obtaining approval of the receivership court as provided in Section 443.007, the liquidator may, subject to Subsection (z), transfer rights to payment under ceding reinsurance agreements covering policies to a third-party transferee.

(z) The transferee of a right to payment under Subsection (y)(4) has the rights to collect and enforce collection of the reinsurance for the amount payable to the ceding insurer or to its receiver, without diminution because of the insolvency or because the receiver has failed to pay all or a portion of the claim, based on the amounts paid or allowed pursuant to Section 443.211. The transfer of the rights does not give rise to any defense regarding the reinsurer's obligations under the reinsurance agreement regardless of whether an agreement or other applicable law prohibits the transfer of rights under the reinsurance agreement. Except as provided in this subsection, any transfer of rights pursuant to Subsection (y)(4) does not impair any rights or defenses of the reinsurer that existed prior to the transfer or that would have existed in the absence of the transfer. Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, any transfer of rights pursuant to Subsection (y)(4) does not relieve the transferee or the liquidator from obligations owed to the reinsurer pursuant to the reinsurance or other agreement.

(aa) The liquidator is not obligated to defend any action against the insurer or insured. Any insureds not defended by a guaranty association may provide their own defense, and include the cost of the defense as part of their claims, if the defense was an obligation of the insurer. The right of the liquidator to contest coverage on a particular claim is preserved without the necessity for an express reservation of rights.

Added by Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 995 (H.B. 2157), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2005.

Redesignated from Insurance Code - Not Codified, Art/Sec 21A.154 by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 730 (H.B. 2636), Sec. 3B.004(a)(1), eff. September 1, 2007.

Amended by:

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 730 (H.B. 2636), Sec. 3B.004(r), eff. September 1, 2007.

Redesignated from Insurance Code - Not Codified, Art/Sec 21A.154 by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 921 (H.B. 3167), Sec. 9.004(a)(1), eff. September 1, 2007.

Amended by:

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 921 (H.B. 3167), Sec. 9.004(r), eff. September 1, 2007.

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 193 (S.B. 1433), Sec. 7, eff. September 1, 2011.

Sec. 443.155. NOTICE TO CREDITORS AND OTHERS. (a) Unless the receivership court otherwise directs, the liquidator shall give or cause to be given notice of the liquidation order as soon as possible:

(1) by first class mail or electronic communication as permitted by the receivership court to:

(A) any guaranty association that is or may become obligated as a result of the liquidation and any national association of guaranty associations;

(B) all the insurer's agents, brokers, or producers of record with current appointments or current licenses to represent the insurer and all other agents, brokers, or producers as the liquidator deems appropriate at their last known address; and

(C) all persons or entities known or reasonably expected to have claims against the insurer, at their last known address as indicated by the records of the insurer, and all state and federal agencies with an interest in the proceeding; and

(2) by publication in a newspaper of general circulation in the county in which the insurer has its principal place of business and in any other locations as the liquidator deems appropriate.

(b) The notice of the entry of an order of liquidation must contain or provide directions for obtaining the following information:

(1) a statement that the insurer has been placed in liquidation;

(2) a statement that certain acts are stayed under Section 443.008 and describe any additional injunctive relief ordered by the receivership court;

(3) a statement whether, and to what extent, the insurer's policies continue in effect;

(4) to the extent applicable, a statement that coverage by state guaranty associations may be available for all or part of policy benefits in accordance with applicable state guaranty laws;

(5) a statement of the deadline for filing claims, if established, and the requirements for filing a proof of claim pursuant to Section 443.251 on or before that date;

(6) a statement of the date, time, and location of any initial status hearing scheduled at the time the notice is sent;

(7) a description of the process for obtaining notice of matters before the receivership court; and

(8) any other information the liquidator or the receivership court deems appropriate.

(c) If notice is given in accordance with this section, the distribution of property of the insurer under this chapter is conclusive with respect to all claimants, whether or not they received notice.

(d) Notwithstanding the other provisions of this section, the liquidator has no duty to locate any persons or entities if no address is found in the records of the insurer or if mailings are returned to the liquidator because of inability to deliver at the address shown in the insurer's books and records. In these circumstances the notice by publication as required by this chapter or actual notice received is sufficient notice. Written certification by the liquidator or other knowledgeable person acting for the liquidator that the notices were deposited in the United States mail, postage prepaid, or that the notices have been electronically transmitted is prima facie evidence of mailing and receipt. All claimants shall keep the liquidator informed of any changes of address.

(e) Notwithstanding Subsection (a)(1)(C), upon application of the liquidator, the receivership court may:

(1) find that notice by publication as required in this section is sufficient notice to those persons holding an occurrence policy that expired more than four years prior to the entry of the order of liquidation and under which there are no pending claims; or

(2) order other notice to persons described by Subdivision (1) as it deems appropriate.

(f) The liquidator shall notify the Texas Workers' Compensation Commission upon the entry of the liquidation order if the insurer has issued workers' compensation coverage in effect in this state. Upon request of the liquidator, the Texas Workers' Compensation Commission shall submit a list of active cases pending before the commission that relate to workers' compensation coverage issued by the insurer.

Added by Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 995 (H.B. 2157), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2005.

Redesignated from Insurance Code - Not Codified, Art/Sec 21A.155 by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 730 (H.B. 2636), Sec. 3B.004(a)(1), eff. September 1, 2007.

Amended by:

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 730 (H.B. 2636), Sec. 3B.004(s), eff. September 1, 2007.

Redesignated from Insurance Code - Not Codified, Art/Sec 21A.155 by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 921 (H.B. 3167), Sec. 9.004(a)(1), eff. September 1, 2007.

Amended by:

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 921 (H.B. 3167), Sec. 9.004(s), eff. September 1, 2007.

Sec. 443.156. DUTIES OF AGENTS. (a) Every person who represented the insurer as an agent and receives notice in the form prescribed in Section 443.155 that the insurer is the subject of a liquidation order, not later than the 30th day after the date of the notice, shall provide to the liquidator, in addition to the information the agent may be required to provide pursuant to Section 443.010, the information in the agent's records related to any policy issued by the insurer through the agent and any policy issued by the insurer through an agent under contract to the agent. For purposes of this subsection, a policy is issued through an agent if the agent has a property interest in the expiration of the policy or if the agent has had in the agent's possession a copy of the declarations of the policy at any time during the life of the policy, except where the ownership of the expiration of the policy has been transferred to another.

(b) Any agent failing to provide information to the liquidator as required in Subsection (a) may be subject to payment of an administrative penalty under Chapter 84 of not more than $1,000. In addition, the agent's license may be suspended under Chapter 4005.

Added by Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 995 (H.B. 2157), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2005.

Redesignated from Insurance Code - Not Codified, Art/Sec 21A.156 by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 730 (H.B. 2636), Sec. 3B.004(a)(1), eff. September 1, 2007.

Amended by:

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 730 (H.B. 2636), Sec. 3B.004(t), eff. September 1, 2007.

Redesignated from Insurance Code - Not Codified, Art/Sec 21A.156 by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 921 (H.B. 3167), Sec. 9.004(a)(1), eff. September 1, 2007.

Amended by:

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 921 (H.B. 3167), Sec. 9.004(t), eff. September 1, 2007.

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 355 (H.B. 4030), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2021.

SUBCHAPTER E. ASSET RECOVERY

Sec. 443.201. TURNOVER OF ASSETS. (a) If the receiver determines that funds or property in the possession of another person are rightfully the property of the estate, the receiver shall deliver to the person a written demand for immediate delivery of the funds or property, referencing this section by number and the court and docket number of the receivership action, and notifying the person that any claim of right to the funds or property by the person must be presented to the receivership court not later than the 20th day after the date of the written demand. Any person who holds funds or other property belonging to an entity subject to an order of receivership under this chapter shall deliver the funds or other property to the receiver on demand. Should the person allege any right to retain the funds or other property, the person, not later than the 20th day after the date of receipt of the demand that the funds or property be delivered to the receiver, shall file with the receivership court a pleading setting out that right. The person shall serve a copy of the pleading on the receiver. The pleading must inform the receivership court as to the nature of the claim to the funds or property, the alleged value of the property or amount of funds held, and what action, pending determination of the dispute, has been taken by the person to preserve and protect the property or to preserve any funds. The relinquishment of possession of funds or property by any person who has received a demand pursuant to this section does not constitute a waiver of a right to make a claim in the receivership.

(b) If requested by the receiver, the receivership court shall hold a hearing to determine where and under what conditions the person shall hold the property or funds pending determination of the dispute. The receivership court may impose conditions as it may deem necessary or appropriate for the preservation of the property or funds until the receivership court can determine the validity of the person's claim to the property or funds. If any property or funds are allowed to remain in the possession of the person after demand made by the receiver, that person is strictly liable to the estate for any waste, loss, or damage to or diminution of value of the property or funds retained.

(c) If a person has filed a pleading alleging any right to retain funds or property as provided by Subsection (a), the receivership court shall hold a subsequent hearing to determine the entitlement of the person to the funds or property claimed by the receiver.

(d) If a person fails to deliver the funds or property or to file the pleading described by Subsection (a) within the period described by Subsection (a), the receivership court may, upon petition of the receiver and upon a copy of the petition being served by the receiver to that person, issue its summary order directing the immediate delivery of the funds or property to the receiver and finding that the person has waived all claims of right to the funds or property.

Added by Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 995 (H.B. 2157), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2005.

Redesignated from Insurance Code - Not Codified, Art/Sec 21A.201 by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 730 (H.B. 2636), Sec. 3B.004(a)(1), eff. September 1, 2007.

Redesignated from Insurance Code - Not Codified, Art/Sec 21A.201 by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 921 (H.B. 3167), Sec. 9.004(a)(1), eff. September 1, 2007.

Sec. 443.202. RECOVERY FROM AFFILIATES. (a) The receiver has a right to recover from any affiliate of the insurer any property of the insurer transferred to or for the benefit of the affiliate, or the property's value, if the transfer was made within the two years preceding the initial petition for receivership.

(b) A transfer is not recoverable under Subsection (a) if the affiliate shows that, when the transfer was made:

(1) the insurer was solvent;

(2) the transfer was lawful; and

(3) neither the insurer nor the affiliate knew or reasonably should have known that the transfer, under then-applicable statutory accounting standards, would:

(A) place the insurer:

(i) in violation of applicable capital or surplus requirements;

(ii) below the applicable minimum risk-based capital level; or

(iii) in violation of writing ratios under Article 1.32 or analogous requirements under Section 843.406; or

(B) cause the insurer's filed financial statements not to present fairly the capital and surplus of the insurer.

Added by Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 995 (H.B. 2157), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2005.

Redesignated from Insurance Code - Not Codified, Art/Sec 21A.202 by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 730 (H.B. 2636), Sec. 3B.004(a)(1), eff. September 1, 2007.

Redesignated from Insurance Code - Not Codified, Art/Sec 21A.202 by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 921 (H.B. 3167), Sec. 9.004(a)(1), eff. September 1, 2007.

Sec. 443.203. UNAUTHORIZED POST-PETITION TRANSFERS. (a) Except as provided by this section, the receiver may avoid any transfer of an interest of the insurer in property or any obligation incurred by the insurer that:

(1) was made or occurred after the petition for receivership was filed; and

(2) is not authorized by the receiver and approved by the receivership court or otherwise authorized in accordance with this chapter.

(b) Except to the extent that a transfer or obligation avoidable under Subsection (a) is otherwise voidable under this chapter, a transferee or obligee of a transfer or obligation avoided under Subsection (a) that takes for value and in good faith, at the option of the receivership court, has a lien or may retain any interest transferred or enforce any obligation incurred, as applicable, to the extent that the transferee or obligee gave value to the insurer in exchange for the transfer or obligation.

Added by Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 995 (H.B. 2157), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2005.

Redesignated from Insurance Code - Not Codified, Art/Sec 21A.203 by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 730 (H.B. 2636), Sec. 3B.004(a)(1), eff. September 1, 2007.

Redesignated from Insurance Code - Not Codified, Art/Sec 21A.203 by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 921 (H.B. 3167), Sec. 9.004(a)(1), eff. September 1, 2007.

Sec. 443.204. VOIDABLE PREFERENCES AND LIENS. (a) A "preference" is a transfer of any interest in property of an insurer that:

(1) is made to or for the benefit of a creditor and for or on account of an antecedent debt and is made or suffered by the insurer within two years preceding the filing of a successful petition commencing delinquency proceedings; and

(2) enables the creditor to receive more than the creditor would receive if the insurer were liquidated under this chapter, the transfer had not been made, and the creditor was entitled to receive payment of the debt to the extent provided by this chapter.

(b) Any preference may be avoided by the receiver if:

(1) the insurer was insolvent at the time of the transfer;

(2) the transfer was made within 120 days before the date of filing of the petition commencing delinquency proceedings;

(3) the creditor receiving the transfer or to be benefited by the transfer, or the creditor's agent acting with reference to the transfer, had, at the time the transfer was made, reasonable cause to believe that the insurer was insolvent or was about to become insolvent; or

(4) the creditor receiving the transfer was:

(A) an officer or director of the insurer;

(B) an employee, attorney, or other person who was in fact in a position to effect a level of control or influence over the actions of the insurer comparable to that of an officer or director, without regard to whether the person held that position; or

(C) an affiliate.

(c) The receiver may not avoid a transfer under this section:

(1) to the extent that the transfer was:

(A) intended by the insurer and the creditor to or for whose benefit the transfer was made to be a contemporaneous exchange for new value given to the insurer and in fact was a substantially contemporaneous exchange; or

(B) made in the ordinary course of business or financial affairs between the insurer and the transferee and made according to ordinary business terms in payment of a debt incurred by the insurer in the ordinary course of business or financial affairs of the insurer and the transferee; or

(2) to or for the benefit of a creditor, to the extent that, after the transfer, the creditor gave new value to or for the benefit of the insurer that was:

(A) not secured by an otherwise unavoidable security interest; and

(B) on account of which new value the insurer did not make an otherwise unavoidable transfer to or for the benefit of the creditor.

(d) For purposes of this section:

(1) a transfer of property other than real property is deemed to be made or suffered at the time the transfer becomes so far perfected that any subsequent lien obtainable by legal or equitable proceedings on a simple contract could not become superior to the rights of the transferee;

(2) a transfer of real property is deemed to be made or suffered when the transfer is so far perfected that a subsequent bona fide purchaser from the insurer could not obtain rights superior to the rights of the transferee;

(3) a transfer that creates an equitable lien is not deemed to be perfected if there are available means by which a legal lien could be created; and

(4) a transfer not perfected prior to the filing of a petition for receivership is deemed to be made immediately before the filing commencing delinquency proceedings.

(e) The provisions of this section apply without regard to whether there are or were creditors who might have obtained liens or persons who might have become bona fide purchasers.

(f) Within the meaning of Subsection (d), "a lien obtainable by legal or equitable proceedings on a simple contract" is a lien arising in the ordinary course of proceedings upon the entry or docketing of a judgment or decree, or upon attachment, garnishment, execution, or similar process, whether before, upon, or after judgment or decree and whether before or upon levy. The term does not include liens that under applicable law are given a special priority over other liens that are prior in time.

(g) Within the meaning of Subsection (d), a lien obtainable by legal or equitable proceedings could become superior to the rights of a transferee, or a purchaser could obtain rights superior to the rights of a transferee if the consequences would follow only from the lien or purchase itself, or from the lien or purchase followed by any step wholly within the control of the respective lienholder or purchaser, with or without the aid of ministerial action by public officials. A lien could not, however, become superior and a purchase could not create superior rights for the purpose of Subsection (d) through any acts subsequent to the obtaining of the lien or subsequent to the purchase that require the agreement or concurrence of any third party or that require any further judicial action or ruling.

(h) A transfer of property for or on account of a new and contemporaneous consideration that is deemed under Subsection (d) to be made or suffered after the transfer because of delay in perfecting the transfer does not become a transfer for or on account of an antecedent debt if any acts required by the applicable law to be performed to perfect the transfer against liens or bona fide purchasers' rights are performed within 21 days or any period expressly allowed by the law, whichever is less. A transfer to secure a future loan, if the loan is actually made, or a transfer that becomes security for a future loan, has the same effect as a transfer for or on account of a new and contemporaneous consideration.

(i)(1) If any lien deemed voidable under Subsection (b) has been dissolved by the furnishing of a bond or other obligation, the surety on which has been indemnified directly or indirectly by the transfer of or the creation of a lien upon any property of an insurer before the filing of a petition commencing delinquency proceedings under this chapter, the indemnifying transfer or lien is also deemed voidable.

(2) The property affected by any lien deemed voidable under Subsection (b) and Subdivision (1) is discharged from the lien, and that property and any of the indemnifying property transferred to or for the benefit of a surety passes to the receiver, except that the receivership court may on due notice order any lien deemed voidable under this section to be preserved for the benefit of the estate and may direct that a conveyance be executed as may be proper or adequate to evidence the title of the receiver.

(3) Reasonable notice of any hearing in the proceeding shall be given to all parties as required by law, including the obligee of a releasing bond or other like obligation. If an order is entered for the recovery of indemnifying property in kind or for the avoidance of an indemnifying lien, the receivership court may in the same proceeding ascertain the value of the property or lien. If the value of the property or lien is less than the amount for which the property is indemnified or than the amount of the lien, the transferee or lienholder may elect to retain the property or lien upon payment to the receiver of its value, as determined by the receivership court, within a reasonable time determined by the receivership court.

(4) The liability of the surety under a releasing bond or other similar obligation shall be discharged to the extent of the value of the indemnifying property recovered or the indemnifying lien nullified and avoided by the receiver, or if the property is retained under Subdivision (3) to the extent of the amount paid to the receiver.

(j) This section may not be construed to prejudice any other claim by the receiver against any person.

Added by Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 995 (H.B. 2157), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2005.

Redesignated from Insurance Code - Not Codified, Art/Sec 21A.204 by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 730 (H.B. 2636), Sec. 3B.004(a)(1), eff. September 1, 2007.

Redesignated from Insurance Code - Not Codified, Art/Sec 21A.204 by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 921 (H.B. 3167), Sec. 9.004(a)(1), eff. September 1, 2007.

Sec. 443.205. FRAUDULENT TRANSFERS AND OBLIGATIONS. (a) The receiver may avoid any transfer of an interest of the insurer in property, any reinsurance transaction, or any obligation incurred by an insurer that was made or incurred on or within two years before the date of the initial filing of a petition commencing delinquency proceedings under this chapter, if the insurer voluntarily or involuntarily:

(1) made the transfer or incurred the obligation with actual intent to hinder, delay, or defraud any person to which it was or became indebted on or after the date that the transfer was made or the obligation was incurred; or

(2) received less than a reasonably equivalent value in exchange for the transfer or obligation.

(b) Except to the extent that a transfer or obligation voidable under this section is voidable under other provisions of this chapter, a transferee or obligee that takes for value and in good faith a voidable transfer or obligation has a lien on or may retain any interest transferred or may enforce any obligation incurred, as the case may be, to the extent that the transferee or obligee gave value to the insurer in exchange for the transfer or obligation.

(c) For purposes of this section, a transfer is made when the transfer is so perfected that a subsequent bona fide purchaser from the insurer cannot acquire an interest in the property transferred that is superior to the interest in the property of the transferee, but if the transfer is not so perfected before the commencement of the delinquency proceeding, the transfer is deemed to have been made immediately before the date of the initial filing of the petition commencing delinquency proceedings.

(d) For purposes of this section, "value" means property or satisfaction or securing of a present or antecedent debt of the insurer.

Added by Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 995 (H.B. 2157), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2005.

Redesignated from Insurance Code - Not Codified, Art/Sec 21A.205 by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 730 (H.B. 2636), Sec. 3B.004(a)(1), eff. September 1, 2007.

Redesignated from Insurance Code - Not Codified, Art/Sec 21A.205 by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 921 (H.B. 3167), Sec. 9.004(a)(1), eff. September 1, 2007.

Sec. 443.206. RECEIVER AS LIEN CREDITOR. (a) The receiver may avoid any transfer of or lien upon the property of, or obligation incurred by, an insurer that the insurer or a policyholder, creditor, member, or stockholder of the insurer may have avoided without regard to any knowledge of the receiver, the commissioner, the insurer, or any policyholder, creditor, member, or stockholder of the insurer regardless of whether such a policyholder, creditor, member, or stockholder exists.

(b) The receiver is deemed a creditor without knowledge for purposes of pursuing claims under the Uniform Fraudulent Transfer Act, the Uniform Fraudulent Conveyance Act, or similar provisions of state or federal law.

Added by Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 995 (H.B. 2157), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2005.

Redesignated from Insurance Code - Not Codified, Art/Sec 21A.206 by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 730 (H.B. 2636), Sec. 3B.004(a)(1), eff. September 1, 2007.

Redesignated from Insurance Code - Not Codified, Art/Sec 21A.206 by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 921 (H.B. 3167), Sec. 9.004(a)(1), eff. September 1, 2007.

Sec. 443.207. LIABILITY OF TRANSFEREE. (a) Except as otherwise provided in this section, to the extent that the receiver obtains an order under Section 443.201 or avoids a transfer under Section 443.202, 443.203, 443.204, 443.205, or 443.206, the receiver may recover the property transferred, or the value of the property, from:

(1) the initial transferee of the transfer or the entity for whose benefit the transfer was made; or

(2) any immediate or mediate transferee of the initial transferee.

(b) The receiver may not recover under Subsection (a)(2) from:

(1) a transferee that takes for value, including satisfaction or securing of a present or antecedent debt, in good faith, and without knowledge of the voidability of the transfer avoided; or

(2) any immediate or mediate good faith transferee of the transferee.

(c) Any transfer avoided in accordance with this chapter is preserved for the benefit of the receivership estate, but only with respect to property of the insurer.

(d) In addition to the remedies specifically provided under Sections 443.201-443.206 and Subsection (a), if the receiver is successful in establishing a claim to the property or any part of the property, the receiver is entitled to recover judgment for:

(1) rental for the use of the tangible property from the later of the entry of the receivership order or the date of the transfer;

(2) in the case of funds or intangible property, the greater of:

(A) the actual interest or income earned by the property; or

(B) interest at the statutory rate for judgments from the later of the date of the entry of the receivership order or the date of the transfer; and

(3) except as to recoveries from guaranty associations, all costs, including investigative costs and other expenses necessary to the recovery of the property or funds, and reasonable attorney's fees.

(e) In any action under this section, the receivership court may allow the receiver to seek recovery of the property involved or the property's value.

(f) In any action under Sections 443.201-443.206, the receiver has the burden of proving the avoidability of a transfer, and the person against whom recovery or avoidance is sought has the burden of proving the nature and extent of any affirmative defense.

Added by Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 995 (H.B. 2157), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2005.

Redesignated from Insurance Code - Not Codified, Art/Sec 21A.207 by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 730 (H.B. 2636), Sec. 3B.004(a)(1), eff. September 1, 2007.

Amended by:

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 730 (H.B. 2636), Sec. 3B.004(u), eff. September 1, 2007.

Redesignated from Insurance Code - Not Codified, Art/Sec 21A.207 by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 921 (H.B. 3167), Sec. 9.004(a)(1), eff. September 1, 2007.

Amended by:

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 921 (H.B. 3167), Sec. 9.004(u), eff. September 1, 2007.

Sec. 443.208. CLAIMS OF HOLDERS OF VOID OR VOIDABLE RIGHTS. (a) A claim of a creditor who has received or acquired a preference, lien, conveyance, transfer, assignment, or encumbrance voidable under this chapter may not be allowed unless the creditor surrenders the preference, lien, conveyance, transfer, assignment, or encumbrance. If the avoidance is effected by a proceeding in which a final judgment has been entered, the claim may not be allowed unless the money is paid or the property is delivered to the receiver not later than the 30th day after the date of the entering of the final judgment, except that the receivership court may allow further time if there is an appeal or other continuation of the proceeding.

(b) A claim allowable under Subsection (a) by reason of the avoidance, whether voluntary or involuntary, or a preference, lien, conveyance, transfer, assignment, or encumbrance, may be filed as an excused late filing under Section 443.251(b) if filed not later than the 30th day after the date of the avoidance, or within the further time allowed by the receivership court under Subsection (a).

Added by Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 995 (H.B. 2157), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2005.

Redesignated from Insurance Code - Not Codified, Art/Sec 21A.208 by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 730 (H.B. 2636), Sec. 3B.004(a)(1), eff. September 1, 2007.

Amended by:

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 730 (H.B. 2636), Sec. 3B.004(v), eff. September 1, 2007.

Redesignated from Insurance Code - Not Codified, Art/Sec 21A.208 by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 921 (H.B. 3167), Sec. 9.004(a)(1), eff. September 1, 2007.

Amended by:

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 921 (H.B. 3167), Sec. 9.004(v), eff. September 1, 2007.

Sec. 443.209. SETOFFS. (a) All mutual debts or mutual credits, whether arising out of one or more contracts between the insurer and another person in connection with any action or proceeding under this chapter, must be set off and only the balance shall be allowed or paid, except as provided by Subsection (b).

(b) A setoff may not be allowed in favor of any person if:

(1) the obligation of the insurer to the person:

(A) would not, at the date of the commencement of the delinquency proceeding, entitle the person to share as a claimant in the assets of the insurer; or

(B) was purchased by or transferred to the person:

(i) after the commencement of the delinquency proceeding; or

(ii) for the purpose of increasing setoff rights;

(2) the obligation of the insurer is owed to an affiliate of the person, or any other entity or association other than the person;

(3) the obligation of the person:

(A) is as a trustee or fiduciary; or

(B) is to pay:

(i) an assessment levied against the members of a mutual insurer, reciprocal or interinsurance exchange, or Lloyd's plan; or

(ii) a balance upon a subscription to the capital stock of a capital stock insurance company; or

(4) the obligations between the person and the insurer arise from reinsurance transactions in which either the person or the insurer has assumed risks and obligations from the other party and then has ceded back to that party substantially the same risks and obligations.

(c) The receiver shall provide an interested person with accounting statements identifying all debts that are due and payable. If a person owes the insurer amounts that are due and payable against which the person asserts a setoff of mutual credits that, in the future, may become due and payable from the insurer, the person shall promptly pay the amounts due and payable to the receiver. Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, the receiver shall promptly and fully refund, to the extent of a person's prior payments under this section, any mutual credits that become due and payable to the person by the insurer.

Added by Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 995 (H.B. 2157), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2005.

Redesignated from Insurance Code - Not Codified, Art/Sec 21A.209 by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 730 (H.B. 2636), Sec. 3B.004(a)(1), eff. September 1, 2007.

Redesignated from Insurance Code - Not Codified, Art/Sec 21A.209 by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 921 (H.B. 3167), Sec. 9.004(a)(1), eff. September 1, 2007.

Sec. 443.210. ASSESSMENTS. (a) As soon as practicable, but not later than the fourth anniversary of the date of an order of receivership of an insurer issuing assessable policies, the receiver shall make a report to the receivership court setting forth:

(1) the reasonable value of the assets of the insurer;

(2) the insurer's probable total liabilities;

(3) the probable aggregate amount of the assessment necessary to pay all claims of creditors and expenses in full, including expenses of administration and costs of collecting the assessment; and

(4) a recommendation as to whether an assessment should be made and in what amount.

(b) Upon the basis of the report provided in Subsection (a), including any supplements and amendments to the report, the receivership court may approve, solely on application by the receiver, one or more assessments against all members of the insurer who are subject to assessment. The order approving the assessment shall provide instructions regarding notice of the assessment, deadlines for payment, and other instructions to the receiver regarding collection of the assessment.

(c) Subject to any applicable legal limits on ability to assess, the aggregate assessment must be for the amount that the sum of the probable liabilities, the expenses of administration, and the estimated cost of collection of the assessment, exceeds the value of existing assets, with due regard being given to assessments that cannot be collected economically.

(d) After levy of assessment under Subsection (b), the receiver shall petition the receivership court for an order directing each member who has not paid the assessment pursuant to the levy to show cause why a judgment for the assessment should not be entered.

(e) At least 20 days before the return day of the order to show cause, the receiver shall give notice of the order to show cause to each member liable on the assessment. Notice must be given by first class mail mailed to the member's last known address as it appears on the insurer's records, by publication, or by another method of notification as directed by the receivership court. Failure of the member or subscriber to receive the notice of the assessment or of the order, within the time specified in the assessment or order or at all, is not a defense in a proceeding to collect the assessment.

(f) If a member does not appear and serve verified objections upon the receiver on or before the return day of the order to show cause under Subsection (d), the receivership court shall make an order adjudging the member liable for the amount of the assessment against the member under Subsection (d) together with costs, and the receiver shall have a judgment against the member for the amount of the assessment and costs in the order.

(g) If on or before the return day of the order to show cause, the member appears and serves verified objections upon the receiver, the receivership court may hear and determine the matter or may appoint a referee to hear it and make an order as the facts warrant. In the event that the receiver determines that the objections do not warrant relief from assessment, the member may request the receivership court to review the matter and vacate the order to show cause.

(h) The receiver may enforce any order or collect any judgment under Subsection (f) by any lawful means.

(i) Any assessment of a subscriber or member of an insurer made by the receiver pursuant to the order of receivership court fixing the aggregate amount of the assessment against all members or subscribers and approving the classification and formula made by the receiver under this section is prima facie correct.

(j) Any claim filed by an assessee who fails to pay an assessment, after the conclusion of any legal action by the assessee objecting to the assessment, is deemed a late filed claim under Section 443.251.

Added by Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 995 (H.B. 2157), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2005.

Redesignated from Insurance Code - Not Codified, Art/Sec 21A.210 by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 730 (H.B. 2636), Sec. 3B.004(a)(1), eff. September 1, 2007.

Amended by:

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 730 (H.B. 2636), Sec. 3B.004(w), eff. September 1, 2007.

Redesignated from Insurance Code - Not Codified, Art/Sec 21A.210 by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 921 (H.B. 3167), Sec. 9.004(a)(1), eff. September 1, 2007.

Amended by:

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 921 (H.B. 3167), Sec. 9.004(w), eff. September 1, 2007.

Sec. 443.211. REINSURER'S LIABILITY. (a) If the receiver has claims under policies covered by reinsurance, the liability of the reinsurer to the receiver under the policies reinsured may not be diminished because of the insolvency of the insurer, regardless of any provisions in the reinsurance contract to the contrary, except under the following circumstances:

(1) a contract or other written agreement entered into before the delinquency proceeding that is otherwise permitted by law specifically provides another payee of the reinsurance in the event of the insolvency of the ceding insurer;

(2) the assuming insurer, under an assumption reinsurance agreement and with the consent of the direct insured, has assumed, as direct obligations of the assuming insurer, the policy obligations of the ceding insurer to the payees under policies and in substitution for the obligations of the ceding insurer to those payees; or

(3) a life and health insurance guaranty association has made the election to succeed to the rights and obligations of the insolvent insurer under a contract of reinsurance in accordance with the life and health guaranty association laws of this state or its domiciliary state or another applicable law, rule, order, or assignment contract, in which case payments shall be made directly to or at the direction of the guaranty association.

(b) Except as provided by Subsection (a), any reinsurance shall be payable to the receiver under a policy reinsured by the assuming insurer on the basis of claims:

(1) allowed under Section 443.253; or

(2) paid under:

(A) Chapter 462, 463, or 2602; or

(B) the guaranty associations of other states.

(c) The liquidator or receiver, as applicable, shall give written notice to affected reinsurers of the pendency of a claim against the receiver under a reinsured policy within a reasonable time after the claim is filed in the delinquency proceeding. During the pendency of the claim any affected reinsurer may:

(1) investigate the claim; and

(2) intervene, at the reinsurer's own expense, in any proceeding where the claim is to be adjusted and assert any defense or defenses which it may deem available to the delinquent company, the liquidator, or the receiver.

(d) Subject to court approval, an expense incurred under Subsection (c)(1) or (2) shall be chargeable against the delinquent company as part of the expense of liquidation, to the extent of a proportionate share of the benefit which may accrue to the delinquent company solely as a result of the defense undertaken by the assuming insurer.

(e) If two or more assuming insurers are involved in the same claim and a majority in interest elect to intervene and assert a defense to a claim described by Subsection (c), an expense incurred under Subsection (c)(1) or (2) shall be apportioned in accordance with the terms of the reinsurance agreement as though the expense had been incurred by the ceding insurer.

(f) Nothing in this chapter shall be construed as authorizing the receiver, or other entity, to compel payment from a non-life reinsurer on the basis of estimated incurred but not reported losses or outstanding reserves, except outstanding reserves with respect to claims made pursuant to Section 443.255 and approved workers compensation claims filed under Section 443.252(d).

Added by Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 995 (H.B. 2157), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2005.

Redesignated from Insurance Code - Not Codified, Art/Sec 21A.211 by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 730 (H.B. 2636), Sec. 3B.004(a)(1), eff. September 1, 2007.

Amended by:

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 730 (H.B. 2636), Sec. 3B.004(x), eff. September 1, 2007.

Redesignated from Insurance Code - Not Codified, Art/Sec 21A.211 by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 921 (H.B. 3167), Sec. 9.004(a)(1), eff. September 1, 2007.

Amended by:

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 921 (H.B. 3167), Sec. 9.004(x), eff. September 1, 2007.

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 193 (S.B. 1433), Sec. 8, eff. September 1, 2011.

Sec. 443.212. RECOVERY OF PREMIUMS OWED. (a) An insured shall pay, either directly to the receiver or to any agent that has paid or is obligated to pay the receiver on behalf of the insured, any unpaid earned premium or retrospectively rated premium due the insurer based on the termination of coverage under Section 443.152. Premium on surety business is deemed earned at inception if a policy term cannot be determined. All other premium is deemed earned and is prorated equally over the determined policy term, regardless of any provision in the bond, guaranty, contract or other agreement.

(b) Any person, other than the insured, shall turn over to the receiver any unpaid premium due and owing as shown on the records of the insurer, including any amount representing commissions, for the full policy term due the insurer at the time of the entry of the receivership order, whether earned or unearned, based on the termination of coverage under Section 443.152. The unpaid premium due the receiver from any person other than the insured excludes any premium not collected from the insured and not earned based on the termination of coverage under Section 443.152.

(c) Any person, other than the insured, responsible for the remittance of a premium, shall turn over to the receiver any unearned commission of the person based on the termination of coverage under Section 443.152. Credits, setoffs, or both may not be allowed to an agent, broker, premium finance company, or any other person for any amounts advanced to the insurer by the person on behalf of, but in the absence of a payment by, the insured, or for any other amount paid by the person to any other person after the entry of the order of receivership.

(d) Persons that collect premium or finance premium under a premium finance contract that is due the insurer in receivership are deemed to hold that premium in trust as fiduciaries for the benefit of the insurer and to have availed themselves of the laws of this state, regardless of any provision to the contrary in any agency contract or other agreement.

(e) Any premium finance company is obligated to pay any amounts due the insurer from premium finance contracts, whether the premium is earned or unearned. The receiver has the right to collect any unpaid financed premium directly from the premium finance company or directly from the insured that is a party to the premium finance contract.

(f) Upon satisfactory evidence of a violation of this section by a person other than an insured, the commissioner may pursue one or more of the following courses of action:

(1) suspend, revoke, or refuse to renew the licenses of the offending party or parties; and

(2) impose:

(A) an administrative penalty under Chapter 84 of not more than $1,000 for each act in violation of this section by the party or parties; and

(B) any other sanction or penalty authorized by Chapter 82.

Added by Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 995 (H.B. 2157), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2005.

Redesignated from Insurance Code - Not Codified, Art/Sec 21A.212 by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 730 (H.B. 2636), Sec. 3B.004(a)(1), eff. September 1, 2007.

Amended by:

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 730 (H.B. 2636), Sec. 3B.004(y), eff. September 1, 2007.

Redesignated from Insurance Code - Not Codified, Art/Sec 21A.212 by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 921 (H.B. 3167), Sec. 9.004(a)(1), eff. September 1, 2007.

Amended by:

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 921 (H.B. 3167), Sec. 9.004(y), eff. September 1, 2007.

Sec. 443.213. ADMINISTRATION OF DEDUCTIBLE AGREEMENTS AND POLICYHOLDER COLLATERAL. (a) Any collateral held to secure the obligations of a policyholder under a deductible agreement with an insurer subject to a delinquency proceeding under this chapter must be maintained and administered as provided in this section. For purposes of this section, a "deductible agreement" is any combination of one or more policies, endorsements, contracts, or security agreements that:

(1) provide for the policyholder to bear the risk of loss within a specified amount per claim or occurrence covered under a policy of insurance; and

(2) may be subject to an aggregate limit of policyholder reimbursement obligations.

(b) This section applies to any collateral described by Subsection (a), regardless of whether the collateral is held by, for the benefit of, or assigned to the insurer under a deductible agreement. The collateral shall be used to secure the policyholder's obligation to fund or reimburse claims payments within the agreed deductible amount, subject to this section.

(c) If the contract between the policyholder and the insurer allows the policyholder to fund claims within the deductible amount through a third-party administrator or otherwise, the receiver shall allow that funding arrangement to continue, except as prohibited by Title 5, Labor Code. If a policyholder funds claims within the deductible amount, the receiver or any guaranty association has no obligation to pay claims for the amount funded by the policyholder, and the policyholder or its third-party administrator is not obligated to reimburse a guaranty association for any amount funded. A charge of any kind may not be made against a guaranty association based on the funding of claims payments by a policyholder under this subsection.

(d) If the receiver is holding collateral provided by a policyholder to secure both a deductible agreement and other obligations of the policyholder, the receiver shall:

(1) allocate the collateral among these obligations in accordance with the deductible agreement; or

(2) in the absence of an allocation provision in the deductible agreement and with the approval of the receivership court, allocate the collateral equitably among these obligations.

(e) If, under Subsection (d), the collateral secures reimbursement obligations under more than one line of insurance, the receiver shall equitably allocate the collateral among the various lines based on the estimated ultimate exposure within the deductible amount for each line.

(f) If a guaranty association is obligated to pay claims under a policy under Subsection (d), the receiver shall give notice to the guaranty associations of any allocation under this section.

(g) Once all claims covered by the collateral have been paid and the receiver is satisfied that no new claims may be presented, the receiver shall release any remaining collateral to the policyholder in accordance with the provisions of the contract and of this chapter.

(h) To the extent a guaranty association is required by applicable law to pay any claims for which the insurer would have been entitled to reimbursement from the policyholder, the following provisions apply:

(1) The receiver shall promptly invoice the policyholder for the reimbursement due under the agreement, and the policyholder is obligated to pay the amount invoiced to the receiver for the benefit of the guaranty associations that paid the claims. Neither the insolvency of the insurer nor the insurer's inability to perform any obligations under the deductible agreement is a defense to the policyholder's reimbursement obligation under the deductible agreement. At the time the policyholder reimbursements are collected, the receiver shall promptly forward those amounts to the guaranty association, based on the claims paid by the guaranty association that were subject to the deductible.

(2) If the collateral is insufficient to reimburse the guaranty association for claims paid within the deductible, the receiver shall use any existing collateral to make a partial reimbursement to the guaranty association, subject to any allocation under Subsection (d), (e), or (f). If more than one guaranty association has a claim against the same collateral, the receiver shall prorate payments to each guaranty association based on the amount of the claims each guaranty association has paid.

(3) The receiver is entitled to deduct from reimbursements owed to a guaranty association or collateral to be returned to a policyholder reasonable actual expenses incurred in fulfilling the receiver's responsibilities under this section. Expenses incurred to collect reimbursements for the benefit of a guaranty association are subject to the approval of the guaranty association. Any remaining expenses that are not deducted from the reimbursements are payable subject to Section 443.015.

(4) The receiver shall provide any affected guaranty associations with a complete accounting of the receiver's deductible billing and collection activities on a quarterly basis, or at other intervals as may be agreed to between the receiver and the guaranty associations. Accountings under this subdivision must include copies of the policyholder billings, the reimbursements collected, the available amounts and use of collateral for each account, and any prorating of payments.

(5) If the receiver fails to make a good faith effort to collect reimbursements due from a policyholder under a deductible agreement within 120 days of receipt of claims payment reports from a guaranty association, the guaranty association may, after notice to the receiver, collect the reimbursements that are due, and, in so doing, the guaranty association shall have the same rights and remedies as the receiver. A guaranty association shall report any amounts collected under this subdivision and expenses incurred in collecting those amounts to the receiver.

(6) The receiver shall periodically adjust the collateral held as the claims subject to the deductible agreement are paid, provided that adequate collateral is maintained. The receiver is not required to adjust the collateral more than once a year. The receiver shall inform the guaranty associations of all collateral reviews, including the basis for the adjustment.

(7) Reimbursements received or collected by a guaranty association under this section may not be considered a distribution of the insurer's assets. A guaranty association shall provide the receiver with an accounting of any amounts it has received or collected under this section and any expenses incurred in connection with that receipt or collection. The amounts received, net of any expenses incurred in connection with collection of the amounts, must be set off against the guaranty association's claim filed under Section 443.251 for the payments that were reimbursed.

(8) To the extent that a guaranty association pays a claim within the deductible amount that is not reimbursed by either the receiver or by policyholder payments, the guaranty association has a claim for those amounts in the delinquency proceeding in accordance with Section 443.251.

(9) Nothing in this section limits any rights of a guaranty association under applicable law to obtain reimbursement for claims payments made by the guaranty association under policies of the insurer or for the association's related expenses.

(i) If a claim that is subject to a deductible agreement and secured by collateral is not covered by any guaranty association, the following provisions apply:

(1) The receiver is entitled to retain as an asset of the estate any collateral or deductible reimbursements obtained by the receiver.

(2) If a policyholder fails to assume an obligation under a deductible agreement to pay a claim, the receiver shall use the collateral to adjust and pay the claim to the extent that the available collateral, after any allocation under Subsection (d), (e), or (f), is sufficient to pay all outstanding and anticipated claims within the deductible. If the collateral is exhausted and all reasonable means of collection against the insured have been exhausted, the remaining claims shall be subject to the provisions of Sections 443.251 and 443.301.

(3) The receiver is entitled to deduct from collateral reasonable actual expenses incurred in fulfilling the receiver's responsibilities under this section. Any remaining expenses that are not deducted from the reimbursements are payable subject to Section 443.015.

Added by Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 995 (H.B. 2157), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2005.

Redesignated from Insurance Code - Not Codified, Art/Sec 21A.213 by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 730 (H.B. 2636), Sec. 3B.004(a)(1), eff. September 1, 2007.

Amended by:

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 730 (H.B. 2636), Sec. 3B.004(z), eff. September 1, 2007.

Redesignated from Insurance Code - Not Codified, Art/Sec 21A.213 by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 921 (H.B. 3167), Sec. 9.004(a)(1), eff. September 1, 2007.

Amended by:

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 921 (H.B. 3167), Sec. 9.004(z), eff. September 1, 2007.

SUBCHAPTER F. CLAIMS

Sec. 443.251. FILING OF CLAIMS. (a) Except as provided by this subsection, proof of all claims must be filed with the liquidator in the form required by Section 443.252 on or before the last day for filing specified in the notice required under Section 443.155, which date may not be later than 18 months after entry of the order of liquidation, unless the receivership court, for good cause shown, extends the time, except that proofs of claims for cash surrender values or other investment values in life insurance and annuities and for any other policies insuring the lives of persons need not be filed unless the liquidator expressly so requires. The receivership court, only upon application of the liquidator, may allow alternative procedures and requirements for the filing of proofs of claim or for allowing or proving claims. Upon application, if the receivership court dispenses with the requirements of filing a proof of claim by a person or a class or group of persons, a proof of claim for the person, class, or group is deemed to have been filed for all purposes, except that the receivership court's waiver of proof of claim requirements does not impact guaranty association proof of claim filing requirements or coverage determinations to the extent the guaranty fund statute or filing requirements are inconsistent with the receivership court's waiver of proof.

(b) The liquidator shall permit a claimant that makes a late filing to share ratably in distributions, whether past or future, as if the claim were not filed late, to the extent that the payment will not prejudice the orderly administration of the liquidation, under the following circumstances:

(1) the eligibility to file a proof of claim was not known to the claimant, and the claimant filed a proof of claim not later than the 90th day after the date of first learning of the eligibility;

(2) a transfer to a creditor was avoided under Section 443.202, 443.203, 443.204, or 443.206, or was voluntarily surrendered under Section 443.208, and the filing satisfies the conditions of Section 443.208; or

(3) the valuation under Section 443.260, of security held by a secured creditor shows a deficiency, and the claim for the deficiency is filed not later than the 30th day after the valuation.

(c) The liquidator may petition the receivership court to set a date before which all late claims under Subsection (b) must be filed.

(d) The liquidator shall permit guaranty associations to file claims late and to receive a ratable share of distributions, whether past or future, as if the claims were not late.

Added by Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 995 (H.B. 2157), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2005.

Redesignated from Insurance Code - Not Codified, Art/Sec 21A.251 by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 730 (H.B. 2636), Sec. 3B.004(a)(1), eff. September 1, 2007.

Amended by:

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 730 (H.B. 2636), Sec. 3B.004(aa), eff. September 1, 2007.

Redesignated from Insurance Code - Not Codified, Art/Sec 21A.251 by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 921 (H.B. 3167), Sec. 9.004(a)(1), eff. September 1, 2007.

Amended by:

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 921 (H.B. 3167), Sec. 9.004(aa), eff. September 1, 2007.

Sec. 443.252. PROOF OF CLAIM. (a) Proof of claim consists of a statement signed by the claimant or on behalf of the claimant that includes all of the following, as applicable:

(1) the particulars of the claim, including the consideration given for it;

(2) the identity and amount of the security on the claim;

(3) the payments, if any, made on the debt;

(4) that the sum claimed is justly owing and that there is no setoff, counterclaim, or defense to the claim;

(5) any right of priority of payment or other specific right asserted by the claimant;

(6) the name and address of the claimant and the attorney, if any, who represents the claimant; and

(7) the claimant's social security or federal employer identification number.

(b) The liquidator may require that:

(1) a prescribed form be used; and

(2) other information and documents be included.

(c) At any time the liquidator may:

(1) require the claimant to present information or evidence supplementary to that required under Subsection (a); and

(2) take testimony under oath, require production of affidavits or depositions, or otherwise obtain additional information or evidence.

(d) Any guaranty association must be permitted to file a single omnibus proof of claim for all claims of the association in connection with payment of claims of the insurer. The omnibus proof of claim may be periodically updated by the association, and the association may be required to submit a reasonable amount of documentation in support of the claim. A guaranty association's claim under this subsection may include amounts for anticipated payments after the closing of the receivership including incurred but not reported claims.

Added by Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 995 (H.B. 2157), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2005.

Redesignated from Insurance Code - Not Codified, Art/Sec 21A.252 by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 730 (H.B. 2636), Sec. 3B.004(a)(1), eff. September 1, 2007.

Redesignated from Insurance Code - Not Codified, Art/Sec 21A.252 by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 921 (H.B. 3167), Sec. 9.004(a)(1), eff. September 1, 2007.

Sec. 443.253. ALLOWANCE OF CLAIMS. (a) Except as provided in Subsections (i) and (l), the liquidator shall review all claims duly filed in the liquidation proceeding and shall further investigate as the liquidator considers necessary. Consistent with the provisions of this chapter, the liquidator may allow, disallow, or compromise the amount for which claims will be recommended to the receivership court, unless the liquidator is required by law to accept claims as settled by a person or organization, including a guaranty association, subject to any statutory or contractual rights of the affected reinsurers to participate in the claims allowance process. No claim under a policy of insurance may be allowed for an amount in excess of the applicable policy limits.

(b) Pursuant to the review, the liquidator shall provide written notice of the claim determination by any means authorized by Section 443.007 to the claimant or the claimant's attorney and may provide notice to any reinsurer that is or may be liable in respect of the claim. The notice must set forth the amount of the claim allowed by the liquidator, if any, and the priority class of the claim as established in Section 443.301.

(c) Not later than the 45th day after the mailing of the notice as set forth in Subsection (b), those noticed may submit written objections to the liquidator. Any submitted objections must clearly set out all facts and the legal basis, if any, for the objections and the reasons why the claim should be allowed at a different amount or in a different priority class. If no timely objection is filed, the determination is final.

(d) A claim that has not become mature as of the coverage termination date established under Section 443.201 because payment on the claim is not yet due may be allowed as if it were mature. A claim that is allowed under this subsection may be discounted to present value based upon a reasonable estimated date of the payment, if the liquidator determines that the present value of the payment is materially less than the amount of the payment.

(e) A judgment or order against an insured or the insurer entered after the date of the initial filing of a successful petition for receivership, or within 120 days before the initial filing of the petition, or a judgment or order against an insured or the insurer entered at any time by default or by collusion need not be considered as evidence of liability or of the amount of damages.

(f) Claims under employment contracts by directors, officers, or persons in fact performing similar functions or having similar powers are limited to payment for services rendered prior to any order of receivership, unless explicitly approved in writing by:

(1) the commissioner prior to an order of receivership;

(2) the rehabilitator before the entry of an order of liquidation; or

(3) the liquidator after the entry of an order of liquidation.

(g) The total liability of the insurer to all claimants arising out of the same act or policy may not be greater than the insurer's total liability would have been were the insurer not in liquidation.

(h) The liquidator shall disallow claims for de minimis amounts as determined by the receivership court as being reasonable and necessary for administrative convenience.

(i) A claim that does not contain all the applicable information required by Section 443.252 need not be further reviewed or adjudicated, and may be denied or disallowed by the liquidator subject to the notice and objection procedures in this section.

(j) The liquidator may reconsider a claim on the basis of additional information and amend the recommendation to the receivership court. The claimant must be afforded the same notice and opportunity to be heard on all changes in the recommendation as in its initial determination. The receivership court may amend its allowance or disallowance as appropriate.

(k) The liquidator is not required to process claims for any class until it appears reasonably likely that property will be available for a distribution to that class. If there are insufficient assets to justify processing all claims for any class listed in Section 443.301, the liquidator shall report the facts to the receivership court and make such recommendations as may be appropriate for handling the remainder of the claims.

(l) Any claim by a lessor for damages resulting from the termination of a lease of real property shall be disallowed to the extent that the claim exceeds:

(1) the rent reserved by the lease, without acceleration, for the longer of one year or 15 percent of the remaining term of the lease, not to exceed three years, following the earlier of:

(A) the date of the filing of the petition; or

(B) the date on which the lessor repossessed or the lessee surrendered the leased property; and

(2) any unpaid rent due under the lease, without acceleration, on the earlier of the dates described by Subdivision (1).

(m) If a claim is fully covered by a guaranty association, the liquidator has no obligation to process the claim in accordance with this section and may refuse to process the claim in accordance with this section.

Added by Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 995 (H.B. 2157), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2005.

Redesignated from Insurance Code - Not Codified, Art/Sec 21A.253 by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 730 (H.B. 2636), Sec. 3B.004(a)(1), eff. September 1, 2007.

Amended by:

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 730 (H.B. 2636), Sec. 3B.004(bb), eff. September 1, 2007.

Redesignated from Insurance Code - Not Codified, Art/Sec 21A.253 by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 921 (H.B. 3167), Sec. 9.004(a)(1), eff. September 1, 2007.

Amended by:

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 921 (H.B. 3167), Sec. 9.004(bb), eff. September 1, 2007.

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 193 (S.B. 1433), Sec. 9, eff. September 1, 2011.

Sec. 443.254. CLAIMS UNDER OCCURRENCE POLICIES, SURETY BONDS, AND SURETY UNDERTAKINGS. (a) Subject to the provisions of Section 443.253, any insured has the right to file a claim for the protection afforded under the insured's policy, regardless of whether a claim is known at the time of filing, if the policy is an occurrence policy.

(b) Subject to the provisions of Section 443.253, an obligee under a surety bond or surety undertaking has the right to file a claim for the protection afforded under the surety bond or surety undertaking issued by the insurer under which the obligee is the beneficiary, regardless of whether a claim is known at the time of filing.

(c) After a claim is filed under Subsection (a) or (b), at the time that a specific claim is made by or against the insured or by the obligee, the insured or the obligee shall supplement the claim, and the receiver shall treat the claim as a contingent or unliquidated claim under Section 443.255.

Amended by:

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 730 (H.B. 2636), Sec. 3B.004(cc), eff. September 1, 2007.

Redesignated from Insurance Code - Not Codified, Art/Sec 21A.254 by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 921 (H.B. 3167), Sec. 9.004(a)(1), eff. September 1, 2007.

Amended by:

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 921 (H.B. 3167), Sec. 9.004(cc), eff. September 1, 2007.

Sec. 443.255. ALLOWANCE OF CONTINGENT AND UNLIQUIDATED CLAIMS. (a) A claim of an insured or third party may be allowed under Section 443.253, regardless of the fact that the claim was contingent or unliquidated, if any contingency is removed in accordance with Subsection (b) and the value of the claim is determined. For purposes of this section, a claim is contingent if:

(1) the accident, casualty, disaster, loss, event, or occurrence insured, reinsured, or bonded or reinsured against occurred on or before the date fixed under Section 443.151; and

(2) the act or event triggering the insurer's obligation to pay has not occurred as of the date fixed under Section 443.151.

(b) Unless the receivership court directs otherwise, a contingent claim may be allowed if the claimant has presented proof reasonably satisfactory to the liquidator of the insurer's obligation to pay or the claim was based on a cause of action against an insured of the insurer and:

(1) it may be reasonably inferred from proof presented upon the claim that the claimant would be able to obtain a judgment; and

(2) the person has furnished suitable proof, unless the receivership court for good cause shown otherwise directs, that no further valid claims can be made against the insurer arising out of the cause of action other than those already presented.

(c) The liquidator may petition the receivership court to set a date before which all claims under this section are final. In addition to the notice requirements of Section 443.007, the liquidator shall give notice of the filing of the petition to all claimants with claims that remain contingent or unliquidated under this section.

Added by Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 995 (H.B. 2157), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2005.

Redesignated from Insurance Code - Not Codified, Art/Sec 21A.255 by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 730 (H.B. 2636), Sec. 3B.004(a)(1), eff. September 1, 2007.

Amended by:

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 730 (H.B. 2636), Sec. 3B.004(dd), eff. September 1, 2007.

Redesignated from Insurance Code - Not Codified, Art/Sec 21A.255 by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 921 (H.B. 3167), Sec. 9.004(a)(1), eff. September 1, 2007.

Amended by:

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 921 (H.B. 3167), Sec. 9.004(dd), eff. September 1, 2007.

Sec. 443.256. SPECIAL PROVISIONS FOR THIRD-PARTY CLAIMS. (a) When any third party asserts a cause of action against an insured of an insurer in liquidation, the third party may file a claim with the liquidator on or before the last day for filing claims.

(b) Whether or not the third party files a claim, the insured may file a claim on the insured's own behalf in the liquidation.

(c) The liquidator may make recommendations to the receivership court for the allowance of an insured's claim after consideration of the probable outcome of any pending action against the insured on which the claim is based, the probable damages recoverable in the action, and the probable costs and expenses of defense. After allowance by the receivership court, the liquidator shall withhold any distribution payable on the claim, pending the outcome of litigation and negotiation between the insured and the third party. The liquidator may reconsider the claim as provided in Section 443.253(j). As claims against the insured are settled or barred, the insured or third party, as appropriate, shall be paid from the amount withheld the same percentage distribution as was paid on other claims of like priority, based on the lesser of the amount actually due from the insured by action or paid by agreement plus the reasonable costs and expense of defense, or the amount allowed on the claims by the receivership court. After all claims are settled or barred, any sum remaining from the amount withheld shall revert to the undistributed property of the insurer.

(d) If several claims founded upon one policy are timely filed under this section, whether by third parties or as claims by the insured, and the aggregate amount of the timely filed allowed claims exceeds the aggregate policy limits, the liquidator may:

(1) apportion the policy limits ratably among the timely filed allowed claims; or

(2) give notice to the insured, known third parties, and affected guaranty associations that the aggregate policy limits have been exceeded. On and after the 30th day after the date of the liquidator's notice, further amounts may not be allowed, the policy limits shall be apportioned ratably among the timely filed allowed claims, and any additional claims shall be rejected.

(e) Claims by the insured under Subsection (d) must be evaluated as described by Subsection (c). If any insured's claim is subsequently reduced under Subsection (c), the amount freed by the reduction must be apportioned ratably among the claims which have been reduced under Subsection (d).

(f) A claim may not be allowed under this section to the extent the claim is covered by any guaranty association.

(g) A claimant may withdraw a proof of claim with the liquidator's approval. The liquidator may approve the withdrawal only upon a showing of good cause and after giving notice of the withdrawal to the insured.

(h) The filing of a proof of claim in connection with a claim against an insured has the following effect on the rights of the claimant and the insured:

(1) By filing a proof of claim, a claimant waives any right to pursue the personal assets of the insured with respect to the claim, to the extent of the coverage or policy limits provided by the insurer, and agrees that to the extent of the coverage or policy limits provided by the insurer, the claimant will seek satisfaction of the claim against the insured solely from distributions paid by the liquidator on the claim and from any payments that a guaranty association may pay on account of the claim, except as provided in this section.

(2) The waiver provided under this section is conditioned upon the cooperation of the insured with the liquidator and any applicable guaranty association in the defense of the claim. The waiver provided under this section does not operate to:

(A) discharge the guaranty association from any of the association's responsibilities and duties;

(B) release the insured with respect to any claim in excess of the coverage or policy limits provided by the insurer or any other responsible party; or

(C) release the insured with respect to any claim by a guaranty association for reimbursement under the law applicable to the guaranty association.

(3) The waiver provided under this section is void if:

(A) a claimant withdraws the claimant's proof of claim under Subsection (g); or

(B) the liquidator avoids insurance coverage in connection with a proof of the claim.

(4) The liquidator shall provide, where applicable, notice of the election of remedies provision in this section on any proof of claim form the liquidator distributes. The notice must be inserted above the claimant's signature line in typeface not smaller than the typeface of the rest of the notice and, in any event not smaller than a 14-point font, and must include a statement substantially similar to the following: "I understand by filing this claim in the estate of the insurer I am waiving any right to pursue the personal assets of the insured to the extent that there are policy limits or coverage provided by the now insolvent insurer."

Added by Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 995 (H.B. 2157), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2005.

Redesignated from Insurance Code - Not Codified, Art/Sec 21A.256 by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 730 (H.B. 2636), Sec. 3B.004(a)(1), eff. September 1, 2007.

Amended by:

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 730 (H.B. 2636), Sec. 3B.004(ee), eff. September 1, 2007.

Redesignated from Insurance Code - Not Codified, Art/Sec 21A.256 by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 921 (H.B. 3167), Sec. 9.004(a)(1), eff. September 1, 2007.

Amended by:

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 921 (H.B. 3167), Sec. 9.004(ee), eff. September 1, 2007.

Sec. 443.257. DISPUTED CLAIMS. (a) When objections to the liquidator's proposed treatment of a claim are filed and the liquidator does not alter the determination of the claim as a result of the objections, the liquidator shall ask the receivership court for a hearing pursuant to Section 443.007.

(b) The provisions of this section are not applicable to disputes with respect to coverage determinations by a guaranty association as part of the association's statutory obligations.

(c) The final disposition by the receivership court of a disputed claim is deemed a final judgment for purposes of appeal.

Added by Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 995 (H.B. 2157), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2005.

Redesignated from Insurance Code - Not Codified, Art/Sec 21A.257 by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 730 (H.B. 2636), Sec. 3B.004(a)(1), eff. September 1, 2007.

Amended by:

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 730 (H.B. 2636), Sec. 3B.004(ff), eff. September 1, 2007.

Redesignated from Insurance Code - Not Codified, Art/Sec 21A.257 by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 921 (H.B. 3167), Sec. 9.004(a)(1), eff. September 1, 2007.

Amended by:

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 921 (H.B. 3167), Sec. 9.004(ff), eff. September 1, 2007.

Sec. 443.258. LIQUIDATOR'S RECOMMENDATIONS TO RECEIVERSHIP COURT. The liquidator shall present to the receivership court, for approval, reports of claims settled or determined by the liquidator under Section 443.253. The reports must be presented from time to time as determined by the liquidator and must include information identifying the claim and the amount and priority class of the claim.

Amended by:

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 730 (H.B. 2636), Sec. 3B.004(gg), eff. September 1, 2007.

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 921 (H.B. 3167), Sec. 9.004(gg), eff. September 1, 2007.

Sec. 443.259. CLAIMS OF CODEBTORS. If a creditor does not timely file a proof of the creditor's claim, an entity that is liable to the creditor together with the insurer, or that has secured the creditor, may file a proof of the claim.

Added by Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 995 (H.B. 2157), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2005.

Redesignated from Insurance Code - Not Codified, Art/Sec 21A.259 by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 730 (H.B. 2636), Sec. 3B.004(a)(1), eff. September 1, 2007.

Redesignated from Insurance Code - Not Codified, Art/Sec 21A.259 by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 921 (H.B. 3167), Sec. 9.004(a)(1), eff. September 1, 2007.

Sec. 443.260. SECURED CREDITORS' CLAIMS. (a) The value of any security held by a secured creditor must be determined in one of the following ways:

(1) by converting the same into money according to the terms of the agreement pursuant to which the security was delivered to the creditor; or

(2) by agreement or litigation between the creditor and the liquidator.

(b) If a surety has paid any losses or loss adjustment expenses under its own surety instrument before any petition initiating a delinquency proceeding is filed and the principal to the instrument has posted collateral that remains available to reimburse the losses or loss adjustment expenses at the time the petition is filed and that collateral has not been credited against the payments made, then the receiver has the first priority to use the collateral to reimburse the surety for any pre-petition losses and expenses.

(c) If the principal under a surety bond or surety undertaking has pledged any collateral, including a guaranty or letter of credit, to secure the principal's reimbursement obligation to the insurer issuing the bond or undertaking, the claim of any obligee, or subject to the discretion of the receiver, of any completion contractor under the surety bond or surety undertaking must be satisfied first out of the collateral or its proceeds.

(d) In making any distribution to an obligee or completion contractor under Subsection (c), the receiver shall retain a sufficient reserve for any other potential claim against that collateral.

(e) If collateral is insufficient to satisfy in full all potential claims against it under Subsections (c) and (g), the claims against the collateral must be paid on a pro rata basis, and an obligee or completion contractor under Subsection (c) has a claim, subject to allowance under Section 443.253, for any deficiency.

(f) If the time to assert claims against a surety bond or a surety undertaking has expired, and all claims described by this section have been satisfied in full, any remaining collateral pledged under the surety bond or surety undertaking must be returned to the principal under the bond or undertaking.

(g) To the extent that a guaranty association has made a payment relating to a claim against a surety bond, the guaranty association shall first be reimbursed for that payment and related expenses out of the available collateral or proceeds related to the surety bond. To the extent that the collateral is sufficient, the guaranty association shall be reimbursed 100 percent of its payment. If the collateral is insufficient to satisfy in full all potential claims against the collateral under Subsection (c) and this subsection, a guaranty association that has paid claims on the surety bond is entitled to a pro rata share of the available collateral in accordance with Subsection (e), and the guaranty association has claims against the general assets of the estate in accordance with Section 443.253 for any deficiency. Any payment made to a guaranty association under this subsection from collateral may not be deemed early access or otherwise deemed a distribution out of the general assets or property of the estate, and the guaranty association receiving payment shall subtract any payment from the collateral from the association's final claims against the estate.

(h) An amount determined under Subsection (a) shall be credited upon the secured claim, and the claimant may file a proof of claim, subject to all other provisions of this chapter for any deficiency, which must be treated as an unsecured claim. If the claimant surrenders the claimant's security to the liquidator, the entire claim is treated as if unsecured.

(i) The liquidator may recover from property securing an allowed secured claim the reasonable, necessary costs and expenses of preserving or disposing of the property to the extent of any benefit to the holder of such claim.

Added by Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 995 (H.B. 2157), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2005.

Redesignated from Insurance Code - Not Codified, Art/Sec 21A.260 by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 730 (H.B. 2636), Sec. 3B.004(a)(1), eff. September 1, 2007.

Amended by:

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 730 (H.B. 2636), Sec. 3B.004(hh), eff. September 1, 2007.

Redesignated from Insurance Code - Not Codified, Art/Sec 21A.260 by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 921 (H.B. 3167), Sec. 9.004(a)(1), eff. September 1, 2007.

Amended by:

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 921 (H.B. 3167), Sec. 9.004(hh), eff. September 1, 2007.

Sec. 443.261. QUALIFIED FINANCIAL CONTRACTS. (a) Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, including any other provision of this chapter permitting the modification of contracts, or other law of this state, a person may not be stayed or prohibited from exercising:

(1) a contractual right to terminate, liquidate, or close out any netting agreement or qualified financial contract with an insurer because of:

(A) the insolvency, financial condition, or default of the insurer at any time, provided that the right is enforceable under applicable law other than this chapter; or

(B) the commencement of a formal delinquency proceeding under this chapter;

(2) any right under a pledge, security, collateral, or guarantee agreement, or any other similar security arrangement or credit support document, relating to a netting agreement or qualified financial contract; or

(3) subject to any provision of Section 443.209(b), any right to set off or net out any termination value, payment amount, or other transfer obligation arising under or in connection with a netting agreement or qualified financial contract where the counterparty or its guarantor is organized under the laws of the United States or a state or foreign jurisdiction approved by the Securities Valuation Office of the National Association of Insurance Commissioners as eligible for netting.

(b) Upon termination of a netting agreement, the net or settlement amount, if any, owed by a nondefaulting party to an insurer against which an application or petition has been filed under this chapter shall be transferred to, or on the order of the receiver for, the insurer, even if the insurer is the defaulting party and notwithstanding any provision in the netting agreement that may provide that the nondefaulting party is not required to pay any net or settlement amount due to the defaulting party upon termination. Any limited two-way payment provision in a netting agreement with an insurer that has defaulted is deemed to be a full two-way payment provision as against the defaulting insurer. Any such property or amount is, except to the extent it is subject to one or more secondary liens or encumbrances, a general asset of the insurer.

(c) In making any transfer of a netting agreement or qualified financial contract of an insurer subject to a proceeding under this chapter, the receiver shall either:

(1) transfer to one party, other than an insurer subject to a proceeding under this chapter, all netting agreements and qualified financial contracts between a counterparty or any affiliate of the counterparty and the insurer that is the subject of the proceeding, including:

(A) all rights and obligations of each party under each netting agreement and qualified financial contract; and

(B) all property, including any guarantees or credit support documents, securing any claims of each party under each netting agreement and qualified financial contract; or

(2) transfer none of the netting agreements, qualified financial contracts, rights, obligations, or property referred to in Subdivision (1), with respect to the counterparty and any affiliate of the counterparty.

(d) If a receiver for an insurer makes a transfer of one or more netting agreements or qualified financial contracts, the receiver shall use its best efforts to notify any person who is party to the netting agreements or qualified financial contracts of the transfer not later than noon, the receiver's local time, on the business day following the transfer. For purposes of this subsection, "business day" means a day other than a Saturday, a Sunday, or any day on which either the New York Stock Exchange or the Federal Reserve Bank of New York is closed.

(e) Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, a receiver may not avoid a transfer of money or other property arising under or in connection with a netting agreement or qualified financial contract, or any pledge, security, or collateral or guarantee agreement or any other similar security arrangement or credit support document relating to a netting agreement or qualified financial contract, that is made before the commencement of a formal delinquency proceeding under this chapter. However, a transfer may be avoided under Section 443.205(a) if the transfer was made with actual intent to hinder, delay, or defraud the insurer, a receiver appointed for the insurer, or existing or future creditors.

(f) In exercising any of the receiver's powers under this chapter to disaffirm or repudiate a netting agreement or qualified financial contract, the receiver shall take action with respect to each netting agreement or qualified financial contract and all transactions entered into in connection with the agreement or contract in its entirety. Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, any claim of a counterparty against the estate arising from the receiver's disaffirmance or repudiation of a netting agreement or qualified financial contract that has not been previously affirmed in the liquidation or immediately preceding rehabilitation case must be determined and must be allowed or disallowed as if the claim had arisen before the date of the filing of the petition for liquidation or, if a rehabilitation proceeding is converted to a liquidation proceeding, as if the claim had arisen before the date of the filing of the petition for rehabilitation. The amount of the claim must be the actual direct compensatory damages determined as of the date of the disaffirmance or repudiation of the netting agreement or qualified financial contract. For purposes of this subsection, the term "actual direct compensatory damages" does not include punitive or exemplary damages, damages for lost profit or lost opportunity, or damages for pain and suffering but does include normal and reasonable costs of cover or other reasonable measures of damages utilized in the derivatives market for the contract and agreement claims.

(g) For purposes of this section, the term "contractual right" includes any right, whether or not evidenced in writing, arising under:

(1) statutory or common law;

(2) a rule or bylaw of a national securities exchange, national securities clearing organization, or securities clearing agency;

(3) a rule, bylaw, or resolution of the governing body of a contract market or its clearing organization; or

(4) law merchant.

(h) The provisions of this section do not apply to persons who are affiliates of the insurer that is the subject of the proceeding.

(i) All rights of counterparties under this chapter apply to netting agreements and qualified financial contracts entered into on behalf of the general account or separate accounts if the assets of each separate account are available only to counterparties to netting agreements and qualified financial contracts entered into on behalf of that separate account.

Added by Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 995 (H.B. 2157), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2005.

Redesignated from Insurance Code - Not Codified, Art/Sec 21A.261 by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 730 (H.B. 2636), Sec. 3B.004(a)(1), eff. September 1, 2007.

Amended by:

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 730 (H.B. 2636), Sec. 3B.004(ii), eff. September 1, 2007.

Redesignated from Insurance Code - Not Codified, Art/Sec 21A.261 by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 921 (H.B. 3167), Sec. 9.004(a)(1), eff. September 1, 2007.

Amended by:

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 921 (H.B. 3167), Sec. 9.004(ii), eff. September 1, 2007.

SUBCHAPTER G. DISTRIBUTIONS

Sec. 443.301. PRIORITY OF DISTRIBUTION. The priority of payment of distributions on unsecured claims must be in accordance with the order in which each class of claims is set forth in this section. Every claim in each class shall be paid in full, or adequate funds retained for their payment, before the members of the next class receive payment, and all claims within a class must be paid substantially the same percentage of the amount of the claim. Except as provided by Subsections (a)(2), (a)(3), (i), and (k), subclasses may not be established within a class. No claim by a shareholder, policyholder, or other creditor shall be permitted to circumvent the priority classes through the use of equitable remedies. The order of distribution of claims shall be:

(a) Class 1. (1) The costs and expenses of administration expressly approved or ratified by the liquidator, including the following:

(A) the actual and necessary costs of preserving or recovering the property of the insurer;

(B) reasonable compensation for all services rendered on behalf of the administrative supervisor or receiver;

(C) any necessary filing fees;

(D) the fees and mileage payable to witnesses;

(E) unsecured loans obtained by the receiver; and

(F) expenses, if any, approved by the rehabilitator of the insurer and incurred in the course of the rehabilitation that are unpaid at the time of the entry of the order of liquidation.

(2) The reasonable expenses of a guaranty association, including overhead, salaries and other general administrative expenses allocable to the receivership to include administrative and claims handling expenses and expenses in connection with arrangements for ongoing coverage, other than expenses incurred in the performance of duties under Section 462.002(3), 463.108, 463.111, 463.113, 463.353, or 2602.113 or similar duties under the statute governing a similar organization in another state. In the case of the Texas Property and Casualty Insurance Guaranty Association and other property and casualty guaranty associations, the expenses shall include loss adjustment expenses, including adjusting and other expenses and defense and cost containment expenses. In the event that there are insufficient assets to pay all of the costs and expenses of administration under Subsection (a)(1) and the expenses of a guaranty association, the costs and expenses under Subsection (a)(1) shall have priority over the expenses of a guaranty association. In this event, the expenses of a guaranty association shall be paid on a pro rata basis after the payment of costs and expenses under Subsection (a)(1) in full.

(3) For purposes of Subsection (a)(1)(E), any unsecured loan obtained by the receiver, unless by its terms it otherwise provides, has priority over all other costs of administration. Absent agreement to the contrary, all claims in this subclass share pro rata.

(4) Except as expressly approved by the receiver, any expenses arising from a duty to indemnify the directors, officers, or employees of the insurer are excluded from this class and, if allowed, are Class 5 claims.

(b) Class 2. (1) All claims under policies of insurance, including third-party claims; claims under annuity contracts, including funding agreements, guaranteed investment contracts, and synthetic guaranteed investment contracts; claims under nonassessable policies for unearned premium; claims of obligees and, subject to the discretion of the receiver, completion contractors, under surety bonds and surety undertakings other than bail bonds, mortgage or financial guaranties, or other forms of insurance offering protection against investment risk; claims by principals under surety bonds and surety undertakings for wrongful dissipation of collateral by the insurer or its agents; and claims incurred during the extension of coverage provided for in Section 443.152. For purposes of this subdivision, "annuity contract," "funding agreement," "guaranteed investment contract," and "synthetic guaranteed investment contract" have the meanings assigned by Section 1154.003.

(2) All other claims incurred in fulfilling the statutory obligations of a guaranty association not included in Class 1, including indemnity payments on covered claims and, in the case of the Life, Accident, Health, and Hospital Service Insurance Guaranty Association or another life and health guaranty association, all claims as a creditor of the impaired or insolvent insurer for all payments of and liabilities incurred on behalf of covered claims or covered obligations of the insurer and for the funds needed to reinsure those obligations with a solvent insurer.

(3) Claims for benefits under a health care plan issued by a health maintenance organization.

(4) Claims under insurance policies or contracts for benefits issued by an unauthorized insurer.

(5) Notwithstanding any provision of this chapter, the following claims are excluded from Class 2 priority:

(A) obligations of the insolvent insurer arising out of reinsurance contracts;

(B) obligations, excluding unearned premium claims on policies other than reinsurance agreements, incurred after:

(i) the expiration date of the insurance policy;

(ii) the policy has been replaced by the insured or canceled at the insured's request; or

(iii) the policy has been canceled as provided by this chapter;

(C) obligations to insurers, insurance pools, or underwriting associations and their claims for contribution, indemnity, or subrogation, equitable or otherwise;

(D) any claim that is in excess of any applicable limits provided in the insurance policy issued by the insurer;

(E) any amount accrued as punitive or exemplary damages unless expressly covered under the terms of the policy;

(F) tort claims of any kind against the insurer and claims against the insurer for bad faith or wrongful settlement practices; and

(G) claims of the guaranty associations for assessments not paid by the insurer, which must be paid as claims in Class 5.

(c) Class 3. Claims of the federal government not included in Class 2.

(d) Class 4. Debts due employees for services or benefits to the extent that the debts do not exceed $5,000 or two months salary, whichever is the lesser, and represent payment for services performed within one year before the entry of the initial order of receivership. This priority is in lieu of any other similar priority that may be authorized by law as to wages or compensation of employees.

(e) Class 5. Claims of other unsecured creditors not included in Classes 1 through 4, including claims under reinsurance contracts, claims of guaranty associations for assessments not paid by the insurer, and other claims excluded from Class 2.

(f) Class 6. Claims of any state or local governments, except those specifically classified elsewhere in this section. Claims of attorneys for fees and expenses owed them by an insurer for services rendered in opposing a formal delinquency proceeding. In order to prove the claim, the claimant must show that the insurer that is the subject of the delinquency proceeding incurred the fees and expenses based on its best knowledge, information, and belief, formed after reasonable inquiry, indicating opposition was in the best interests of the insurer, was well grounded in fact, and was warranted by existing law or a good faith argument for the extension, modification, or reversal of existing law, and that opposition was not pursued for any improper purpose, such as to harass or to cause unnecessary delay or needless increase in the cost of the litigation.

(g) Class 7. Claims of any state or local government for a penalty or forfeiture, but only to the extent of the pecuniary loss sustained from the act, transaction, or proceeding out of which the penalty or forfeiture arose, with reasonable and actual costs occasioned thereby. The balance of the claims must be treated as Class 9 claims under Subsection (i).

(h) Class 8. Except as provided in Sections 443.251(b) and (d), late filed claims that would otherwise be classified in Classes 2 through 7.

(i) Class 9. Surplus notes, capital notes or contribution notes or similar obligations, premium refunds on assessable policies, and any other claims specifically assigned to this class. Claims in this class are subject to any subordination agreements related to other claims in this class that existed before the entry of the liquidation order.

(j) Class 10. Interest on allowed claims of Classes 1 through 9, according to the terms of a plan proposed by the liquidator and approved by the receivership court.

(k) Class 11. Claims of shareholders or other owners arising out of their capacity as shareholders or other owners, or any other capacity, except as they may be qualified in Class 2, 5, or 10. Claims in this class are subject to any subordination agreements related to other claims in this class that existed before the entry of the liquidation order.

Amended by:

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 730 (H.B. 2636), Sec. 3B.004(jj), eff. September 1, 2007.

Redesignated from Insurance Code - Not Codified, Art/Sec 21A.301 by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 921 (H.B. 3167), Sec. 9.004(a)(1), eff. September 1, 2007.

Amended by:

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 921 (H.B. 3167), Sec. 9.004(jj), eff. September 1, 2007.

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 193 (S.B. 1433), Sec. 10, eff. September 1, 2011.

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1187 (S.B. 1196), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2015.

Sec. 443.302. PARTIAL AND FINAL DISTRIBUTIONS OF ASSETS. (a) With the approval of the receivership court, the liquidator may declare and pay one or more distributions to claimants whose claims have been allowed. Distributions paid under this subsection must be paid at substantially the same percentage of the amount of the claim.

(b) In determining the percentage of distributions to be paid on these claims, the liquidator may consider the estimated value of the insurer's property, including estimated reinsurance recoverables in connection with the insurer's estimated liabilities for unpaid losses and loss expenses and for incurred but not reported losses and loss expenses, and the estimated value of the insurer's liabilities, including estimated liabilities for unpaid losses and loss expenses and for incurred but not reported losses and loss expenses.

(c) Distribution of property in kind may be made at valuations set by agreement between the liquidator and the creditor and approved by the receivership court.

(d) Notwithstanding the provisions of Subsection (a) and Subchapter D, the liquidator is authorized to pay benefits under a workers' compensation policy after the entry of the liquidation order if:

(1) the insurer has accepted liability and no bona fide dispute exists;

(2) payments under the policy commenced before the entry of the liquidation order; and

(3) future or past indemnity or medical payments are due under the policy.

(e) Claim payments made under Subsection (d) may continue until the date that a guaranty association assumes responsibility for claim payments under the policy.

(f) Any claim payments made under Subsection (d) and any related expenses must be treated as early access payments under Section 443.303 to the guaranty association responsible for the claims.

Added by Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 995 (H.B. 2157), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2005.

Redesignated from Insurance Code - Not Codified, Art/Sec 21A.302 by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 730 (H.B. 2636), Sec. 3B.004(a)(1), eff. September 1, 2007.

Amended by:

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 730 (H.B. 2636), Sec. 3B.004(kk), eff. September 1, 2007.

Redesignated from Insurance Code - Not Codified, Art/Sec 21A.302 by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 921 (H.B. 3167), Sec. 9.004(a)(1), eff. September 1, 2007.

Amended by:

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 921 (H.B. 3167), Sec. 9.004(kk), eff. September 1, 2007.

Sec. 443.303. EARLY ACCESS PAYMENTS. (a) For purposes of this section, "distributable assets" means all general assets of the liquidation estate less:

(1) amounts reserved, to the extent necessary and appropriate, for the entire Section 443.301(a) expenses of the liquidation through and after its closure; and

(2) to the extent necessary and appropriate, reserves for distributions on claims other than those of the guaranty associations falling within the priority classes of claims established in Section 443.301(b).

(b) Early access payments to guaranty associations must be made as soon as possible after the entry of a liquidation order and as frequently as possible after the entry of the order, but at least annually if distributable assets are available to be distributed to the guaranty associations, and must be in amounts consistent with this section. Amounts advanced to an affected guaranty association pursuant to this section shall be accounted for as advances against distributions to be made under Section 443.302. Where sufficient distributable assets are available, amounts advanced are not limited to the claims and expenses paid to date by the guaranty associations; however, the liquidator may not distribute distributable assets to the guaranty associations in excess of the anticipated entire claims of the guaranty associations falling within the priority classes of claims established in Sections 443.301(a) and (b).

(c) Within 120 days after the entry of an order of liquidation by the receivership court, and at least annually after the entry of the order, the liquidator shall apply to the receivership court for approval to make early access payments out of the general assets of the insurer to any guaranty associations having obligations arising in connection with the liquidation or shall report that there are no distributable assets at that time based on financial reporting as required in Section 443.016. The liquidator may apply to the receivership court for approval to make early access payments more frequently than annually based on additional information or the recovery of material assets.

(d) Within 60 days after approval by the receivership court of the applications in Subsection (c), the liquidator shall make any early access payments to the affected guaranty associations as indicated in the approved application.

(e) Notice of each application for early access payments, or of any report required pursuant to this section, must be given in accordance with Section 443.007 to the guaranty associations that may have obligations arising from the liquidation. Notwithstanding the provisions of Section 443.007, the liquidator shall provide these guaranty associations with at least 30 days' actual notice of the filing of the application and with a complete copy of the application prior to any action by the receivership court. Any guaranty association that may have obligations arising in connection with the liquidation has:

(1) the right to request additional information from the liquidator, who may not unreasonably deny such request; and

(2) the right to object as provided by Section 443.007 to any part of each application or to any report filed by the liquidator pursuant to this section.

(f) In each application regarding early access payments, the liquidator shall, based on the best information available to the liquidator at the time, provide, at a minimum, the following:

(1) to the extent necessary and appropriate, the amount reserved for the entire expenses of the liquidation through and after its closure and for distributions on claims falling within the priority classes of claims established in Sections 443.301(b) and (c);

(2) the computation of distributable assets and the amount and method of equitable allocation of early access payments to each of the guaranty associations; and

(3) the most recent financial information filed with the National Association of Insurance Commissioners by the liquidator.

(g) Each guaranty association that receives any payments pursuant to this section agrees, upon depositing the payment in any account to its benefit, to return to the liquidator any amount of these payments that may be required to pay claims of secured creditors and claims falling within the priority classes of claims established in Section 443.301(a), (b), or (c). No bond may be required of any guaranty association.

(h) Nothing in this section affects the method by which a guaranty association determines the association's statutory coverage obligations.

(i) Without the consent of the affected guaranty associations or an order of the receivership court, the liquidator may not offset the amount to be dispersed to any guaranty association by the amount of any specific deposit or any other statutory deposit or asset of the insolvent insurer held in that state unless the association has actually received the deposit.

Added by Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 995 (H.B. 2157), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2005.

Redesignated from Insurance Code - Not Codified, Art/Sec 21A.303 by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 730 (H.B. 2636), Sec. 3B.004(a)(1), eff. September 1, 2007.

Amended by:

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 730 (H.B. 2636), Sec. 3B.004(ll), eff. September 1, 2007.

Redesignated from Insurance Code - Not Codified, Art/Sec 21A.303 by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 921 (H.B. 3167), Sec. 9.004(a)(1), eff. September 1, 2007.

Amended by:

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 921 (H.B. 3167), Sec. 9.004(ll), eff. September 1, 2007.

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 193 (S.B. 1433), Sec. 11, eff. September 1, 2011.

Sec. 443.304. UNCLAIMED AND WITHHELD FUNDS. (a) If any funds of the receivership estate remain unclaimed after the final distribution under Section 443.302, the funds must be placed in a segregated unclaimed funds account held by the commissioner. If the owner of any of the unclaimed funds presents proof of ownership satisfactory to the commissioner before the second anniversary of the date of the termination of the delinquency proceeding, the commissioner shall remit the funds to the owner. The interest earned on funds held in the unclaimed funds account may be used to pay any administrative costs related to the handling or return of unclaimed funds.

(b) If any amounts held in the unclaimed funds account remain unclaimed on or after the second anniversary of the date of the termination of the delinquency proceeding, the commissioner may file a motion for an order directing the disposition of the funds in the court in which the delinquency proceeding was pending. Any costs incurred in connection with the motion may be paid from the unclaimed funds account. The motion shall identify the name of the insurer, the names and last known addresses of the persons entitled to the unclaimed funds, if known, and the amount of the funds. Notice of the motion shall be given as directed by the court. Upon a finding by the court that the funds have not been claimed before the second anniversary of the date of the termination of the delinquency proceeding, the court shall order that any claims for unclaimed funds and any interest earned on the unclaimed funds that has not been expended under Subsection (a) are abandoned and that the funds must be disbursed under one of the following methods:

(1) the amounts may be deposited in the general receivership expense account under Subsection (c);

(2) the amounts may be transferred to the comptroller, and deposited into the general revenue fund; or

(3) the amounts may be used to reopen the receivership in accordance with Section 443.353 and be distributed to the known claimants with approved claims.

(c) The commissioner may establish an account for the following purposes:

(1) to pay general expenses related to the administration of receiverships; and

(2) to advance funds to any receivership that does not have sufficient cash to pay its operating expenses.

(d) Any advance to a receivership under Subsection (c)(2) may be treated as a claim under Section 443.301 as agreed at the time the advance is made or, in the absence of an agreement, in the priority determined to be appropriate by the court.

(e) If the commissioner determines at any time that the funds in the account exceed the amount required, the commissioner may transfer the funds or any part of the funds to the comptroller, and the transferred funds must be deposited into the general revenue fund.

Added by Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 995 (H.B. 2157), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2005.

Redesignated from Insurance Code - Not Codified, Art/Sec 21A.304 by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 730 (H.B. 2636), Sec. 3B.004(a)(1), eff. September 1, 2007.

Amended by:

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 730 (H.B. 2636), Sec. 3B.004(mm), eff. September 1, 2007.

Redesignated from Insurance Code - Not Codified, Art/Sec 21A.304 by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 921 (H.B. 3167), Sec. 9.004(a)(1), eff. September 1, 2007.

Amended by:

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 921 (H.B. 3167), Sec. 9.004(mm), eff. September 1, 2007.

SUBCHAPTER H. DISCHARGE

Sec. 443.351. CONDITION ON RELEASE FROM DELINQUENCY PROCEEDINGS. Until all payments of or on account of the insurer's contractual obligations by all guaranty associations, along with all expenses of the obligations and interest on all the payments and expenses, are repaid to the guaranty associations, unless otherwise provided in a plan approved by the guaranty association, an insurer that is subject to any formal delinquency proceedings may not:

(1) solicit or accept new business or request or accept the restoration of any suspended or revoked license or certificate of authority;

(2) be returned to the control of its shareholders or private management; or

(3) have any of its assets returned to the control of its shareholders or private management.

Added by Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 995 (H.B. 2157), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2005.

Redesignated from Insurance Code - Not Codified, Art/Sec 21A.351 by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 730 (H.B. 2636), Sec. 3B.004(a)(1), eff. September 1, 2007.

Redesignated from Insurance Code - Not Codified, Art/Sec 21A.351 by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 921 (H.B. 3167), Sec. 9.004(a)(1), eff. September 1, 2007.

Sec. 443.352. TERMINATION OF LIQUIDATION PROCEEDINGS. When all property justifying the expense of collection and distribution has been collected and distributed under this chapter, the liquidator shall apply to the receivership court for an order discharging the liquidator and terminating the proceeding. The receivership court may grant the application and make any other orders, including orders to transfer any remaining funds that are uneconomic to distribute, or pursuant to Section 443.302(c), assign any assets that remain unliquidated, including claims and causes of action, as may be deemed appropriate.

Amended by:

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 730 (H.B. 2636), Sec. 3B.004(nn), eff. September 1, 2007.

Redesignated from Insurance Code - Not Codified, Art/Sec 21A.352 by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 921 (H.B. 3167), Sec. 9.004(a)(1), eff. September 1, 2007.

Amended by:

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 921 (H.B. 3167), Sec. 9.004(nn), eff. September 1, 2007.

Sec. 443.353. REOPENING RECEIVERSHIP. After the liquidation proceeding has been terminated and the liquidator discharged, the commissioner or other interested party may at any time petition the court to reopen the delinquency proceeding for good cause, including the discovery of additional property. If the court is satisfied that there is justification for reopening, it shall so order.

Added by Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 995 (H.B. 2157), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2005.

Redesignated from Insurance Code - Not Codified, Art/Sec 21A.353 by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 730 (H.B. 2636), Sec. 3B.004(a)(1), eff. September 1, 2007.

Redesignated from Insurance Code - Not Codified, Art/Sec 21A.353 by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 921 (H.B. 3167), Sec. 9.004(a)(1), eff. September 1, 2007.

Sec. 443.354. DISPOSITION OF RECORDS DURING AND AFTER TERMINATION OF RECEIVERSHIP. (a) When it appears to the receiver that the records of the insurer in receivership are no longer useful, the receiver may recommend to the receivership court and the receivership court shall direct what records should be destroyed.

(b) If the receiver determines that any records should be maintained after the closing of the delinquency proceeding, the receiver may reserve property from the receivership estate for the maintenance of the records, and any amounts so retained are administrative expenses of the estate under Section 443.301(a). Any records retained pursuant to this subsection must be transferred to the custody of the commissioner, and the commissioner may retain or dispose of the records as appropriate, at the commissioner's discretion. Any records of a delinquent insurer that are transferred to the commissioner may not be considered records of the department for any purposes, and Chapter 552, Government Code, does not apply to those records.

Added by Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 995 (H.B. 2157), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2005.

Redesignated from Insurance Code - Not Codified, Art/Sec 21A.354 by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 730 (H.B. 2636), Sec. 3B.004(a)(1), eff. September 1, 2007.

Amended by:

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 730 (H.B. 2636), Sec. 3B.004(oo), eff. September 1, 2007.

Redesignated from Insurance Code - Not Codified, Art/Sec 21A.354 by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 921 (H.B. 3167), Sec. 9.004(a)(1), eff. September 1, 2007.

Amended by:

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 921 (H.B. 3167), Sec. 9.004(oo), eff. September 1, 2007.

Sec. 443.355. EXTERNAL AUDIT OF THE RECEIVER'S BOOKS. (a) The receivership court may, as it deems desirable, order audits to be made of the books of the receiver relating to any receivership established under this chapter. A report of each audit shall be filed with the commissioner and with the receivership court.

(b) The books, records, and other documents of the receivership must be made available to the auditor at any time without notice.

(c) The expense of each audit shall be considered a cost of administration of the receivership.

Added by Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 995 (H.B. 2157), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2005.

Redesignated from Insurance Code - Not Codified, Art/Sec 21A.355 by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 730 (H.B. 2636), Sec. 3B.004(a)(1), eff. September 1, 2007.

Redesignated from Insurance Code - Not Codified, Art/Sec 21A.355 by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 921 (H.B. 3167), Sec. 9.004(a)(1), eff. September 1, 2007.

SUBCHAPTER I. INTERSTATE RELATIONS

Sec. 443.401. ANCILLARY CONSERVATION OF FOREIGN INSURERS. (a) The commissioner may initiate an action against a foreign insurer pursuant to Section 443.051 on any of the grounds stated in that section or on the basis that:

(1) any of the foreign insurer's property has been sequestered, garnished, or seized by official action in its domiciliary state or in any other state;

(2) the foreign insurer's certificate of authority to do business in this state has been revoked or was never issued and there are residents of this state with unpaid claims or in-force policies; or

(3) initiation of the action is necessary to enforce a stay under Section 462.309, 463.404, or 2602.259.

(b) If a domiciliary receiver has been appointed, the commissioner may initiate an action against a foreign insurer under Subsection (a)(1) or (a)(2) only with the consent of the domiciliary receiver.

(c) An order entered pursuant to this section must appoint the commissioner as conservator. The conservator's title to assets must be limited to the insurer's property and records located in this state.

(d) Notwithstanding Section 443.201(c), the conservator shall hold and conserve the assets located in this state until the commissioner in the insurer's domiciliary state is appointed its receiver or until an order terminating conservation is entered under Subsection (g). Once a domiciliary receiver is appointed, the conservator shall turn over to the domiciliary receiver all property subject to an order under this section.

(e) The conservator may liquidate property of the insurer as necessary to cover the costs incurred in the initiation or administration of a proceeding under this section.

(f) The court in which an action under this section is pending may issue a finding of insolvency or an ancillary liquidation order. The court may enter an ancillary liquidation order only for the limited purposes of:

(1) liquidating assets in this state to pay costs under Subsection (e); or

(2) activating relevant laws applicable to guaranty associations to pay valid claims that are not being paid by the insurer.

(g) The conservator may at any time petition the receivership court for an order terminating an order entered under this section.

Added by Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 995 (H.B. 2157), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2005.

Redesignated from Insurance Code - Not Codified, Art/Sec 21A.401 by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 730 (H.B. 2636), Sec. 3B.004(a)(1), eff. September 1, 2007.

Amended by:

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 730 (H.B. 2636), Sec. 3B.004(pp), eff. September 1, 2007.

Redesignated from Insurance Code - Not Codified, Art/Sec 21A.401 by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 921 (H.B. 3167), Sec. 9.004(a)(1), eff. September 1, 2007.

Amended by:

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 921 (H.B. 3167), Sec. 9.004(pp), eff. September 1, 2007.

Sec. 443.402. DOMICILIARY RECEIVERS APPOINTED IN OTHER STATES. (a) A domiciliary receiver appointed in another state is vested by operation of law with title to, and may summarily take possession of, all property and records of the insurer in this state. Notwithstanding any other provision of law regarding special deposits, special deposits held in this state shall be, upon the entry of an order of liquidation with a finding of insolvency, distributed to the guaranty associations in this state as early access payments subject to Section 443.303, in relation to the lines of business for which the special deposits were made. The holder of any special deposit shall account to the domiciliary receiver for all distributions from the special deposit at the time of the distribution. The statutory provisions of another state and all orders entered by courts of competent jurisdiction in relation to the appointment of a domiciliary receiver of an insurer and any related proceedings in another state must be given full faith and credit in this state. For purposes of this section, "another state" means any state other than this state. This state shall treat any other state than this state as a reciprocal state.

(b) Upon appointment of a domiciliary receiver in another state, the commissioner shall, unless otherwise agreed by the receiver, immediately transfer title to and possession of all property of the insurer under the commissioner's control, including all statutory general or special deposits, to the receiver.

(c) Except as provided in Subsection (a), the domiciliary receiver shall handle special deposits and special deposit claims in accordance with federal law and the statutes pursuant to which the special deposits are required. All amounts in excess of the estimated amount necessary to administer the special deposit and pay the unpaid special deposit claims are deemed general assets of the estate. If there is a deficiency in any special deposit so that the claims secured by the special deposit are not fully discharged from the deposit, the claimants may share in the general assets of the insurer to the extent of the deficiency at the same priority as other claimants in their class of priority under Section 443.301, but the sharing must be deferred until the other claimants of their class have been paid percentages of their claims equal to the percentage paid from the special deposit. The intent of this provision is to equalize to this extent the advantage gained by the security provided by the special deposits.

Added by Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 995 (H.B. 2157), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2005.

Redesignated from Insurance Code - Not Codified, Art/Sec 21A.402 by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 730 (H.B. 2636), Sec. 3B.004(a)(1), eff. September 1, 2007.

Amended by:

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 730 (H.B. 2636), Sec. 3B.004(qq), eff. September 1, 2007.

Redesignated from Insurance Code - Not Codified, Art/Sec 21A.402 by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 921 (H.B. 3167), Sec. 9.004(a)(1), eff. September 1, 2007.

Amended by:

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 921 (H.B. 3167), Sec. 9.004(qq), eff. September 1, 2007.